Precision of osteodensitometric measurements using dual energy X-ray absorptiometry (DEXA) depends on various known factors, such as positioning, aortic calcification or vertebral fractures.
The purpose of this study was to investigate the influence of various diseases or bone density on the reproducibility of measurements in the lumbar spine and the proximal femur.
Measurements in the LWS p.a., LWS lat.
and at Ward's triangle were made in a total of 100 patients.
The subjects were repositioned between measurements.
In order to be able to determine the influence of various diseases, four groups of 25 patients each were formed: three with the diagnosis osteoarthrosis, osteoporosis and rheumatoid arthritis and one control group.
The mean percentual difference and coefficient of variation were calculated as the measure for reproducibility.
Mean percentual differences of 0.18 to 2.6% were found in the four groups at the three measurements sites.
After calculation of coefficient of variation, a value between 1.2 and 2.7% was found for LWS p.a., between 7.1 and 15.7% for LWS lat.
and between 4.1 and 9.9% at Ward's triangle.
It was also conspicuous that the difference in coefficient of variation in osteoporosis patients was nearly double that in the control group in all measured areas.
Conclusion: Lateral lumbar spinal measurements using DEXA cannot presently be recommended.
measurements and, with limitations, measurements at Ward's triangle have good precision and could be used for course documentation of bone density.
Background: We compared the endothelial protective function of two hyaluronic acid viscoelastics (Healon GV, Provisc) of different molecular weight and viscosity during phakoemulsification in high-risk eyes.
Diseases of the peripheral nervous system occur in up to 50% of persons infected with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV).
In early stages of the infection, Guillain-Barré syndrome or a spontaneously remitting mononeuropathy can occur.
The most frequent occurrence is distal symmetrical polyneuropathy associated with HIV, which can only be treated symptomatically.
The most important differential diagnosis is a drug-induced polyneuropathy under antiretroviral therapy with the nucleoside analogues DDI, DDC, or D4T.
Chronic inflammatory demyelinating polyneuropathy is less common and can be treated with immunoglobulins or corticosteroids.
Very rare are steroid-responsive neuropathies with necrotizing vasculitis or in diffuse infiltrative lymphocytosis syndrome (DILS).
In the AIDS stage, polyradiculitis can occur due to opportunistic infections - most often with cytomegalovirus (CMV) or M. tuberculosis - or polyradiculopathies due to lymphomatous meningiosis.
Mononeuritis multiplex is rarely seen in disseminated CMV infection.
Myopathies can occur in all stages of HIV infection; their frequency is about 1%.
Primary polymyositis associated with HIV, which can be treated with corticosteroids or immunoglobulin, must be distinguished from myopathy induced by azidothymidine.
Other forms of myopathy are very rare.
54 patients, who had been explored at the end of their treatment including a psychosomatic approach in a medical department of a general hospital, were interviewed again in their homes three months later.
Contentment with treatment was high in the inpatient and outpatient setting, the ill felt only moderately stressed by their illnesses, showed an adaptive constellation of coping styles and were surprisingly well adapted.
The comparison between the two measures showed a less favourable view of the patients three months after discharge from hospital at a quarter of the tested parameters, the variability was high in the scales, that were used.
Explanations for these results are discussed.
At a long term perspective coping with illness may be improved especially by interventions of the family doctors.
Health care costs have risen considerably since 1970 in all industrialized countries.
This has several causes: changes in demographic structure, the large number of physicians, increased personnel needs resulting from generous vacation and special leave privileges, wage increases and - last but not least - medical progress.
Advances in medical technology are often regarded as one of the main reasons for spiralling costs in health care.
Careful analyses reveal, however, that the high costs of imaging services are due to conventional radiography rather than to high-technology (CT, MR) imaging.
The legitimate demands for cost reduction have to be met with improved cost efficiency while optimal quality standards must also be maintained.
Relevant suggestions, such as generally accepted examination strategies, should be realized with the help of the scientific societies.
Background: Main features of the Coffin-Siris syndrome are mental retardation and absent or hypoplastic nails of the fifth fingers and toes.
Further symptoms are wide mouth with prominent lips, sparse scalp hair, and hypertrichosis.
We report on two premature infants who had completed 25 and 29 weeks of gestation and who developed unilateral interstitial pulmonary emphysema.
In both cases massive mediastinal displacement developed with compression and total atelectasis of the contralateral lung.
By selective intubation of the respective main bronchus, complete ventilation of the collapsed lungs and sufficient gas exchange was achieved.
After 3 days (case 1) and after 6 days) case 2), the unilateral emphysema receded and, subsequently, bilateral respiration was possible without relapse.
6 and respectively 11 days after selective intubation, extubation was performed.
The two children were discharged at the age of 41/2 and 21/2 months showing complete respiratory compensation and equal ventilation on both sides.
Patient with extensive keratosis palmoplantaris maculosa seu papulosa (Davies-Colley) presented with multiple cutaneous horns.
The clinical picture, the histology, the electro microscopic examination, the negative tumor screening and the viral classification in the tissue allowed the differentiation from other palmoplantar keratoses.
The patient was treated successfully using a combination of acitretin with physical and chemical measures.
Epidemiologic studies have shown that trace concentrations of inhalation anaesthetics polluting the air of operating theatres could have deleterious effects on the personnel's health.
Nitrous oxide (N2O) oxidises vitamin B12 and thus decreases DNA production by inactivation of methionine synthase.
Therefore, the United States and most European health authorities recommend threshold values to protect against potential health risks.
These values range from 25 to 100 ppm, expressed as time-weighted averages (TWA).
There is a lack of data concerning measurements of trace concentrations under defined conditions.
The aim of this study was to quantify levels of N2O in a recovery room (RR) with an air conditioning system.
The blood loss during the acute period after complex pelvic trauma is finally responsible for the high mortality associated with this specific type of injury.
Several protocols have been published for optimized management, but up to now comparable data are not available as no exact definitions exist judging the severty of trauma and blood loss.
As part of a prospective study 19 patients after unstable pelvic injuries with unstable circulation underwent emergency stabilization by the pelvic C-clamp.
Beside standard clinical parameter the initial hemoglobin value was converted into a "bloodvolume equivalent".
18 of the 19 patients had an injury severety according to group III and IV of the Hannover Polytrauma Score (PTS).
Concommitant abdominal injuries were seen in 12 cases (23 injuries), concommitant urological injuries in 12 cases (14 injuries).
In 13 cases the pelvis was the major source of bleeding in 9 cases an additional intraabdominal hemorrhage was observed.
11 patients died due to sequelae of their injury, 8 patients survived.
Although the initial blood loss was comparable both in the group of the deceased patients and the survivors, a 44% higher subsequent blood substitution (= 10 089 ml) was observed in the nonsurvivor group.
In conclusion the data proofed that early control of hemorrhage is fundamental for the prognoses after complex pelvic trauma.
The estimation of the blood loss may help in indicating agressive emergency procedures like emergency stabilisation, pelvic clamps, surgical exploration and tamponade.
This calculation may be a basis for a more detailed analyses of this devastating injury and judging the benefit of different management protocols.
In contrast to childhood intussusception, the clinical signs of intussusception in adults are nonspecific.
Generally organic alterations of the small bowel cause intussusception in adults.
In this case report on a retrograde jejunojejunal intussusception in a 61-year-old male, following removal of an intraoperatively placed intestinal tube for ileus therapy, the clinical symptoms, diagnostic methods and therapy for intussusception are described.
Sonography is not only the diagnostic tool of choice in childs, but also led to the correct diagnosis in this case.
In contrast to childhood intussusception, operative treatment is preferred in adults.
The term "frontal lobe syndrome" comprises a variety of different clinical syndromes produced by focal lesions involving the prefrontal cortex.
However, similar syndromes can be observed after lesions involving subcortical structures connected with the prefrontal cortex in neuronal networks.
With respect to the different clinical pictures and underlying brain lesions, prefrontal lobe dysfunction may be divided into a disorganized type, caused by lesion of the dorsolateral prefrontal lobe and its connections, a disinhibited type that can be observed following lesions of the orbitofrontal cortex, and an apathetic type following lesions affecting the functional balance between the cingulum and the supplementary motor area.
As intracerebral lesions are rarely limited to the brain regions described, in the majority of patients various degrees of behavioural dysfunction can be observed.
The case reports of four patients illustrating the three major prefrontal syndroms following severe head injury (n=2) or cerebrovascular disease (n=2) are presented and diagnostic implications as well as possible treatment strategies are discussed.
The measures taken in intensive care medicine are rated differently by the patients, their family, and personnel.
A lack of understanding for intensive care therapy can lead to a negative attitude towards intensive care medicine, which in turn makes an impression on public opinion, and disturbs the reputation of the co-workers in intensive care medicine.
To form an objective view, we carried out a survey of 40 co-workers (11 physicians, 23 from the nursing staff, and 6 ancillary personnel) regarding the medical technology, the environment in the unit, general medical questions, and the extent of intensive care therapy.
The length of employment in the intensive care unit ranged from 1-240 months (median 18 months), the ages ranged from 21 to 53 years (median 30 years).
Of those questioned 73%  found intensive care medicine in its current form to be purposeful: 100% of the physicians and only 57% of the nursing staff were of this opinion.
Only 9% of the physicians believed the equipment to be fear-inducing for the patients; in contrast, 61% of the nursing staff believed this to be true.
The noise level was rated as very disturbing by 65% of the nursing staff and 45% of the physicians.
Only 22% of the nursing staff believed that the patients felt comfortable and protected on the intensive care unit; 48% felt that they were unhappy or even miserable.
Of the physicians 46% believed that the patients were comfortable.
Of the nursing staff 100% were of the opinion that for the deceased patients, organ substitution therapy had continued too long.
On the other hand, only 45% of the residents shared this opinion.
The medical staff rated the intensive care measures as purposeful, less disturbing for the patients and more effective than did the nursing staff.
In many cases, the nursing staff as a group exhibited a contrary and negative opinion.
This could possibly be caused by insecurity, lack of information and lack of successful experiences.
Next to patient outcome, the competent explanation and information regarding the disease and prognosis and the recurrent communication within the intensive care team, with respect to diagnostic and therapeutic measures are the deciding factors in the opinion formation regarding intensive care medicine.
In this pilot study 12 patients with moderate to severe atopic eczema were treated with 2 million IU interferon alpha 2a (Roferon A) three times weekly for 8 weeks and followed up for a further 10 weeks: 2 patients showed clear and 9 a slight to moderate reduction of their skin lesions; 1 patient got worse.
Pruritus did not decrease and even increased in a few patients, and IgE levels showed no change during and after treatment.
All patients noted mild, transient, flu-like symptoms.
The efficacy of interferon alpha in the present therapeutic design for the treatment of atopic eczema must thus be classified as only moderate.
Shock secondary to sepsis is a serious common disease with a substantial mortality.
Coagulation abnormalities, ranging from a rapid fulminant state of disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC) to a slight elevation in the level of fibrin(ogen) degradation products, are well recognized in patients with bacterial septicemia.
Therefore, the inhibition of the activated coagulation is one of the first therapeutic steps.
We investigated 30 intensive care patients with septic disease and comparable signs of abnomalities in coagulation at the beginning.
Fifteen patients were treated with 1.5-5 E/kg body weight (Low dose group), the others received 8-15 E/kg (high dose group).
Our study demonstrated a significant stronger and faster decline of coagulation parameters - such as d-dimer, TAT and PTF 1 + 2 - in the High dose group without any bleeding disorder.
Thus, we support in cases of coagulation disease except fulminant ones the high dose therapy with LMWH as shown above.
Background: Laparoscopic techniques are currently used for curative resection of colorectal cancer although long-term results from controlled clinical trials are not available yet that prove laparoscopic procedures are adequate.
Methods: All patients who underwent a curative resection of a colorectal tumor from 1995 to 1997 were included in a prospective cohort study to evaluate the short- and long-term results.
Results: Laparoscopic colorectal resections were accomplished in 68 patients.
In only 3 patients was an adenoma (stage 0) found, and 10 patients had multiple liver metastases at the time of palliative resection.
An oncological resection was performed in 55 patients.
The average age was 62.8  +/-  14.6 years (29 female and 26 male patients).
Eleven right colectomies, 1 left colectomy, 21 sigmoid resections, 16 proctosigmoidectomies and 6 abdominoperineal resections were carried out.
Two patients (3.6 %) were lost during follow-up.
The median follow-up was 27.1 months (range 9.1-45.1 months).
No port-site metastases were found.
Two patients who are still alive after sigmoid resection suffered from a recurrence.
The first patient underwent only limited lymphadenectomy because of synchronous malignant lymphoma.
The second patient developed bilateral lung metastases.
Only one patient died during the follow-up period because of myocardial infarction.
Conclusion: Although the follow-up is short, it seems that the recurrence rate is low.
Controlled multicenter clinical trials are currently performed to evaluate whether laparoscopic surgery is really adequate to treat colorectal cancer.
The authors report a tracheal rupture in a 34-year-old patient who was primarily intubated following generalised seizures and loss of consciousness (Rüsch endotracheal tube).
Some hours later, she developed high ventilatory airway pressures and subcutaneous and mediastinal emphysema were noted.
Reintubation with a high-volume, low-pressure endotracheal tube was planned when it was noted that the ballon of the Rüsch tube was grossly overinflated.
Endotracheal tube cuff pressure was measured and found to be greater than 120 cm H2O (the maximum measurement possible with the manometer).
The diagnosis of tracheal rupture was confirmed by fiberoptic bronchoscopy.
The patient immediately underwent a throacotomy and a 3-cm tear of the pars membranacea of the trachea was sutured with a dural patch.
To maintain low airway pressures post-operatively, she remained sedated for 2 days and received a muscle relaxant to permit pressure-controlled ventilation.
In this case, it can be concluded that excessive inflation of the endotracheal tube cuff resulted in the tracheal rupture.
Other possible causes and results of tracheal rupture are discussed.
Urinary tract infections are the most frequent nosocomial infections, accounting for about 40% of all nosocomial infections.
In most cases these infections are associated with indwelling urinary catheters.
The guideline from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (Atlanta, USA) for the prevention of catheter-associated urinary tract infections, as the most important evidence-based guideline worldwide, was published in 1981 and has not been updated so far.
Evidence-based national guidelines are not available in Germany.
We have, therefore, performed a literature search for randomized, controlled studies on the prevention of catheter-associated urinary tract infections (Medline, Cochrane Library, reference text books) published since 1981.
Fifty studies meeting our inclusion criteria were identified.
Substantial new findings have been published on alternatives to urethral catheters and new catheter materials.
Based upon the CDC guideline, whose principles are still valid, updated guidelines for the prevention of catheter-associated urinary tract infections have been developed by the National Reference Center for Hospital Hygiene.
Chronic hypoperfusion of the hypogastric arteries due to aortoiliac surgery leads to a complex of symptoms well known as Lerich's syndome.
In contrast, acute ischemia of the pelvic arterial tree leads to lethal complications [2, 4, 5, 9, 10, 12, 13].
Acute interruption of the hypogastric perfusion mainly occurs after aortoiliac surgery or after selective transcatheter embolisation of the internal iliac artery for control of pelvic bleeding [1, 8].
Several complications may occur after total occlusion: urinary bladder necrosis [6], left colon ischemia, spinal cord ischemia [10], nerve palsy, necrosis of the rectum and gluteal musculature [2, 11-13].
Despite adequate therapy, mortality is over 70% [2].
We report the case of a 66-year-old patient who survived after acute occlusion of the iliac arteries with gluteal necrosis following replacement of the infrarenal aorta with an aortobiiliacal graft.
As demonstrated in 44 allogeneic sibling (34 HLA identical, 10 HLA mismatched at 1-3 loci) and 6 unrelated (1 HLA-identical, 5 mismatched at 1-3 loci) cord blood (CB) transplantations CB has been shown to be a rich source of hematopoietic stem and progenitor cells.
Therefore, a scientific pilot project in order to evaluate HLA class I and II typed cord blood samples for unrelated transplantation was initiated.
Hitherto 372 CB samples: mean volume 79 +/-  5x108, were collected from the umbilical cord vein immediately after vaginal full term delivery (n=302) or ceasarean section (n=70) and stored frozen in liquid nitrogen.
Methods for HLA-typing by serology for HLA-class I and II from minimal cell amounts were adjusted that only 1.5 ml of the whole CB was needed for both the HLA-class I and II typing by serology (1 ml) and DNA-typing for HLA-class II (0.5 ml).
Only 3.5 additional ml of the CB were required for the AB0 typing, control of sterility, determination of progenitor cells by colony forming assays and CD34 and the analysis of contaminating maternal cells by simultaneous immunophenotypic and genotypic analysis of interphase cells and the PCR using sequence-specific priming (PCR-SSP) for the non-inherited maternal allel.
Mother'sera have been tested for HBsAg, anti-HCV, -HAV, -HIV-1-2, -EBV, -VCA, -HTLVI-II, -CMV, Toxoplasmosis and Syphilis.
Nonepithelial malignant tumors of the pancreas are extremely rare neoplasms with a frequency of ~0,6%.
They are always explored because of a suspected diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma.
Amongst the more than 600 primary pancreatic neoplasms in our pancreatic tumor archive only 5 neoplasms were of nonepithelial origin (one was a malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumor [MPNST], one a leiomyosarcoma, one a malignant mesothelioma, and two were peripheral neuroectodermal tumors [PNET].
The differential diagnosis includes secondary infiltration of the pancreas by mesenchymal tumors of the retroperitoneum, undifferentiated pancreatic carcinoma and, especially in the case of PNET, malignant lymphoma.
Preoperative chemotherapy and down-staging can improve the operability and  prognosis, especially in PNET.
In patients with renal or hepatic failure, the pharmacokinetics of opioids may be affected in several ways, leading to the necessity to correct the dose.
The liver is the major site for biotransformation of most opioids.
The major metabolic pathway is oxidation.
Exceptions to this are morphine and buprenorphine, which undergo primarily glucuronidation, and remifentanil which is cleared by esther hydrolysis.
The hydrophilic metabolites are predominantly excreted by the kidneys and may accumulate in patients with renal insufficiency.
Some metabolites such as morphine-6-glucuronide (M6G) or normeperidine are active opioid agonists.
With high concentrations they may cause narcotic effects or respiratory depression.
In addition, special risks are known for normepridine that has been shown to exert neurotoxic effects with the risk of seizures.
Few cases of respiratory depression following the administration of codeine, dihydrocodeine and tramdol have been reported.
The elimination half-life of these drugs was prolonged.
Lastly, the disposition of methadone, buprenorphine, fentanyl, sufentanyl and remifentanil appears to be unaffected in renal failure.
Backgrounds: Aim of this study was to validate a modification of adults' 13C-urea breath test for children in diagnosis of an infection with Helicobacter pylori.
Methods: In 30 asymptomatic children results of the breath test were compared with results of an ELISA test specific for Helicobacter pylori.
In 10 symptomatic children the breath test result was compared with histological results of gastric mucosa.
Cold orange juice was tested by ultrasonic assessment to be suitable as a test meal.
Results: With the serological or histological result as reference method, the cut-off value for children (delta value = 5 permil) has shown a sensitivity/specificity of 70 %/95 % or 100 %/100 % respectively.
Cold orange juice meets the criteria of a test meal by inhibiting the gastric emptying for the duration of the breath test significantly.
30 minutes after 13C-urea ingestion has been the optimal point of time for the second breath sample collection.
Conclusion: Our modification of the 13C-urea breath test for children is suitable to prove an Helicobacter pylori infection.
This review summarizes some aspects of German pediatrics as it developed after world war II.
Having lost its touch with international pediatrics regained its high standard during the late forties and fifties and now develops in concordance with the changing needs and the advances of pediatrics in a highly industialoized nation.
As in other countries, the practice and structure of pediatrics have been influenced by changes in social attidudes and expectations, and by economic restrictions.
National specifics are the high number of practicing pediatric population and emphasis on a highly structured and formalized preventive care program under a public health plan.
The need for critical evaluation of this program is emphasized as is the need for better communication among subspecialties.
Aim of this study was to isolate T lymphocytes from atheromatous plaques and to determine they respond to Chlamydia antigens.
In recent years, mumps orchitis has become a rarely reported disease.
However, since October 1994 a clear increase in the incidence of this disease has been observed.
At four hospitals in the Saarland, Germany, 45 cases of mumps orchitis in adolescents and adults were diagnosed in this period.
In addition to the case history and clinical findings, the diagnosis was confirmed by an increased IgM titer.
None of the patients had been previously vaccinated.
The main reason for this was a lack of parental knowledge of the necessity for this vaccination, one which has almost no side effects.
The goal of this study is to describe the disease, present our own results, and indicate the need for vaccination.
In addition to providing information, a further aim of the study is to increase the motivation of adolescents and adults for vaccination.
Although many treatments for mumps have been published in recent years, the most successful therapy is still prophylactic vaccination.
Neurofibromas, café au lait macules and freckles in the axillary or inguinal regions are common manifestations of von Recklinghausen's neurofibromatosis (NF-1).
Less known is the simultaneous appearance of dermal melanocytic naevi.
We describe the case of a 21-year-old Vietnamese woman who showed generalized, multiple neurofibromas, a solitary plexiform neurofibroma in the left gluteal region and Lisch nodules.
In addition, there were several large grey-blue macules histologically characterized by fusiform pigment-bearing cells in the dermis, which we diagnosed as persistent aberrant mongolian spots.
In the right zygomatic region she presented a grey-blue, hair-bearing macule, which we saw as a variant of Ota's naevus.
A genetic background for this coincidence of a systemic with a local phakomatosis can be supposed, as both Schwann's cells and melanocytes are derived from the neural crest.
Such pathologic rearrangement in the embryogenesis of the cellular elements could be important for the pathogenesis of NF-1 and dermal melanocytic nevi.
Infectious agents may directly or indirectly (through the response of the host's immune system) modulate the growth of vascular cells.
Local and/or systemic increase of cytokines could influence the extent of (re-)stenosis in the vascular tree.
Further studies in this field may identify patients at a high risk for atherogenesis and restenosis.
Their results should be helpful in treating restenosis after percutaneous coronary interventions.
Besides other reasons, cost containments mandate the rational use of preoperative screening tests which should be adapted to the risk of the individual patient.
Since the perioperative cardiac risk increases with age, elderly patients in particular require a thorough evaluation of their perioperative risk.
Routine ECG, however, is not indicated in patients under 45 years of age who do not present with signs or history of preexisting cardiac diseases but should be performed on a routine basis in all patients over 45 years of age.
The validity of an ergometer test as a preoperative indicator of myocardial ischemia is limited due to a high incidence of false negative results.
By preoperative routine chest radiography previously unknown findings are only detected in a small number of patients; thus, in patients of ASA-risk groups I-II younger than 74 years of age routine chest-x-ray cannot be justified.
In patients whose perioperative cardiac risk as assessed clinically and by ECG is ambiguous, dipyridamole-thallium-myocardial scintigraphy (DTMS) and dobutamine-stress-echocardiography may contribute valuable information regarding the prediction of perioperative adverse cardiac events.
In that respect, dobutamine-stress-echocardiography appears to be superior to DTMS.
The laboratory tests required in patients of different ASA-risk groups and according to their age are presented in an overview.
Generalized muscle weakness in critically ill patients can result in prolonged periods of artificial ventilation and longer stays in the intensive care unit.
Both neuropathic (critical illness polyneuropathy) and myopathic (critical illness myopathy) abnormalities seem to play an important role for this prolonged weakness.
This article reviews its complex differential diagnosis with special emphasis on the current understanding of the neuromuscular syndromes.
An efficient diagnostic plan is necessary for the exclusion of other curable causes of prolonged muscle weakness even in the presence of polyneuromyopathic changes.
Psychological support of the patient and prophylaxis of secondary complications of prolonged immobilization are crucial when specific therapy is not possible.
Modern ultrasonic diagnostic instruments with high resolution and color Doppler sonography allow the obstetrician to describe pathological findings very precisely and at an early stage of pregnancy.
The use of high-resolution ultrasound makes it possible to detect heart malformations already between the 8th and 10th week of gestation.
This development has essentially changed the clinical requirements on fetal autopsy which in its traditional way no longer meets the increased demands.
Unless the pathologists faces this challenge the importance of fetal autopsy will diminish.
Modern image databases and communication techniques allow the pathologist to have direct access to text and images of pre-findings by other clinics.
Great importance, however, must be attached to the interdisciplinary cooperation with obstetricians and geneticists.
We report on routine fetal autopsy by using an interdisciplinary database an the Charité.
Infrainguinal arterial reconstruction for intermittent claudication has been discouraged because of fear of bypass graft failure, significant perioperative complications, and limb loss.
This may be worse than the natural history of the disease.
In our study, we retrospectively evaluated all infrainguinal bypass procedures performed in the past 10 years.
Radiosurgery represents a minimally invasive radiologic method for the treatment of intracranial tumours and arteriovenous malformations.
In 1994 the radiosurgical device 'Leksell Gamma Knife' (LGK) was installed in a dedicated logistic environment for outpatient treatments.
High quality requirements have to be met for radiosurgery.
The target point accuracy taking into account the whole system was shown to be reliably below 0.5 mm whereas the spatial therapeutic resolution was 0.035 cm3.
Quality parameters of the dose plan were evaluated for the first 500 consecutive treatments.
These values and examples of dose plans were used to emphasize the advantages of the treatment principle with multiple isocenters.
An analysis of data in the literature revealed that there is no uniform standard of treatment available in radiosurgery.
A highly significant correlation between a risk prediction model for the stereotactic linear accelerator on the one hand and a different model for the LGK on the other could be shown.
This result could be helpful in order to proceed towards a more uniform treatment standard in radiosurgery and to improve overall treatment results.
Even if Ignaz Philipp Semmelweis has not found the true aetiology of puerperal fever - bacteria were identified as pathogens only after his observations - he was the first to consequently use epidemiological methods in order to elucidate connections and influencing factors in the spread of nosocomial infections, to draw the right conclusions from his observations on the transmission of childbed fever and to draw the right consequences by implementing preventive measures, especially the hand disinfection.
He has correctly realized that human beings suffering from purulent or putride lesions or having even died from them can act as infectious sources as can hands of health-care personnel act as vehicles.
As a characteristic feature of nosocomial infection, he noticed that generally only the weakend organism of the patient is involved as an infection target.
The impact of his doctrine not only made him "saviour of the mothers" but also justifies to regard him as "father of the obstetric infection prevention" if not even as the founder of the modern science-based hospital hygiene.
In this paper we present a method for measuring the wear of the polyethylene inlay in knee joint endoprostheses from standard X-ray images.
Our approach is to estimate the spatial position of the tibial and femoral components of the prostheses from their contours in the X-ray image.
When we know the exact shape of these two components, we can calculate the minimal spatial distance between them which approximates the remaining thickness of the inlay.
First results show that this approach might provide sufficient accuracy for the given task.
Most children with borreliosis show cutaneous symptoms following a tick bite infected with Borrelia Burgdorferi.
Erythema migrans is a classical skin lesion of early borreliosis characterized by a centrifugally expanding erythema at the site of the prior tick bite.
After hematological spreading of the vector multiple erythemata migrantia occur with a very low incidence in Europe as described in the case of a 2 1/2 years old infant who was successfully treated with oral cephalosporine.
One year follow-up revealed no further manifestations of borreliosis.
This means an excellent prognosis for those children with borreliosis who are treated promptly.
Background: We compared the standard suprathreshhold strategy to the so-called threshhold splitting strategy with 5 and 2 dB steps.
The aim of the study was to establish whether the threshhold splitting strategy had advantages over the suprathreshhold strategy that has been used to date.
Resection specimens of 14 patients with small cell bronchial carcinoma after neoadjuvant chemotherapy were processed histologically and graded according to a three-step regression grading system: grade I, no or only slight tumor regression; grade II, incomplete tumor regression; grade III, complete tumor regression without vital tumor tissue.
In five patients with either no vital tumor tissue or only small tumor remnants in the resection samples, a typical sequence of central fresh tumor necrosis, foam cell rim, vascular granulation tissue and peripheral scar formation was seen.
This morphological finding may be interpreted as a characteristic, but unspecific parameter of good response to preoperative chemotherapy.
The presence of vital tumor rims surrounding the capillary bed with intermingled necrotic foci, however, argues in favor of spontaneous tumor regression, which is commonly observed in small cell lung cancer.
Background: The term "Castleman's diseas" (angiofollicular lymph node hyperplasia) comprises a heterogeneous clinicopathologic entity among lymphoproliferative disorders.
In accordance with the German law on care for helpless persons, an observer rating scale has been developed to allow a staging of need of care.
Construction of the scale, item descriptions, definitions, algorithms for sum score and inter-rater reliability data are reported.
The scale can reliably measure the need of care, quality of care, and who is the care provider.
5-Fluorouracil (5-FU) improves the success of trabeculectomy.
Since in vitro studies showed a prolonged effect of 36 days of growth inhibition with a single dose of 5-FU, 5-FU is applied intraoperatively.
To evaluate the effect of intraoperatively applied 5-FU, we compared 13 (low-risk) patients with intraoperative application of 5-FU to a control group matched by age, diagnosis, sex and stage of glaucoma.
Postoperatively on day 4 the IOP was significant lower (4.8 mmHg) in the 5-FU-group in comparison to the untreated group (P=0.005; power 0.80).
After 1 week the difference decreased to 2 mmHg and was not significant any more (P=0.16).
After 1 week a lower mean intraocular pressure of 2 mmHg was found with a P-value of 0.16.
It may be that these results are not just due to an antiproliferative mechanism; a direct toxic effect of 5-FU should be considered.
5-FU side effects such as corneal complications and inflammatory reaction were not increased in the 5-FU group.
However, one case of persistent hypotony was seen in the 5-FU group.
This study found intraoperative use of 5-FU to be a safe procedure with a pronounced capacity to lower IOP in the direct postoperative phase.
However, this effect may not be based on an antiproliferative effect alone, but might be of toxic origin.
A postoperative bile fistula is a rare but severe complication after biliary surgery.
Clinical signs, laboratory findings, ultrasound and ERC lead to diagnosis.
We report on 40 cases with postoperative bile leakage after cholecystectomy treated by a nasobiliary tube.
In all patients the fistula healed within 7 days after placement of the tube.
Two patients needed operative treatment of a subhepatic abscess, and in 2 patients drainage of a bilioma was performed.
In 2 cases with biliary peritonitis, a step-by-step lavage was necessary.
The nasobiliary tube for postoperative bile fistula offers regular radiological control and reduces the necessity of operative reintervention in the biliary tract.
Description of a 27 years old patient with chronic renal failure due to diabetes, which requires dialysis, and tertiary hyperparathyroidism, who developed fulminant systemic calciphylaxis after successful renal transplantation.
Characteristic of this syndrome, there occured soft tissue calcification, mediacalcinosis of the small and medium-sized arteries and ischemic skin necrosis.
The pathogenesis is not completely clear, but challenging agents like corticosteroids or immunsuppressants, in a sensitized organism (at hypercalcemia or elevated parathormon) could lead to calcium deposits.
These are showing a particular affinity for elastic tissue.
Lungs, stomach, kidneys, cutis, heart and vascular system are most frequently involved.
Treatment is primarily supportive; an early parathyroidectomy seems to have the best prognosis.
Contact urticaria and anaphylactic reactions to latex-containing rubber products are being recognized with increasing frequency in all kinds of medical disciplines.
Recently a number of reports have been published describing anaphylactic reactions to food items in patients with latex allergy.
The cases of three patients who developed anaphylactic reactions to both latex and food items are presented, and the importance of the association of latex and cross-reactivity with food items is stressed.
The food items that led to anaphylactic reactions were banana and avocado; banana, avocado and buckwheat; and banana, avocado and tomato.
The cross-reactivity of latex to buckwheat and tomato has not been reported before.
The branchio-oto-renal syndrome (BOR syndrome) is characterized by auricular abnormalities, lateral cervical fistulas and preauricular tags.
The hearing impairment may be a conductive, a sensorineural or a mixed hearing loss.
The renal disease is oligomeganephronia, a bilateral, congenital renal abnormality with reduced numbers of nephrons.
The BOR syndrome is an autosomal-dominant disease.
Corneal metabolism is reduced after cataract extraction.
The available literature on the psychosocial aspects of head and neck cancer surgery from 1950 to 1995 was reviewed in four parts.
The CO2 laser myringotomy is a current low-pain procedure for middle-ear ventilation for secretory otitis media (SOM) that can be performed under topical anesthesia, even in children.
The duration of middle-ear ventilation is essentially determined by the size of the perforation created.
Perforations with a diameter greater than 2 mm ventilate the tympanic cavity for approximately 3 weeks, thus avoiding tympanic ventilation tubes.
To date, the CO2 laser beam can only be reliably applied to the tympanic membrane via a micromanipulator system coupled to an ear microscope.
The CO2 laser otoscope is a new application system that markedly reduces the technical complexity of surgery and improves the mobility and availability of the system.
The incorporation of a small inexpen-sive CO2 laser in the otoscope represents a significant development in SOM therapy.
Abstract   Amifostine is an organic thiophsophate which protecvts normal cells from the effects of chemotherapy with reduced nadir and duration of cyclophosphmamid induced neutropenia, reduced cisplatin derived renal and neurological complications being described.
However, no data are available for urological malignancies treated with cisplatin-based chemotherapy.
Aim of the study was to assess the efficacy of pretreatment with amifostine in terms of prevention of renal, hematopoetic and neurologic toxicity.
17 patients (mean age: 62.6 [45-74]) with advanced transitional cell carcinoma of the urinary bladder received inductive or adjuvant cisplatin based chemotherapy (1-6 cycles) with a cisplatin dose of 70 mg/m2.
Amifostine (740-910 mg/m2) was administered intravenously 30 minutes prior to chemotherapy.
For all patients creatinine clearance, serum creatinine and electrolytes including magnesium, and blood cell count were determined prior to and after each cycle.
A group of 12 patients (mean age: 61.9 [51-67]) did undergo MVEC chemotherapy (1-4 cycles) without receiving amifostine and served as control group.
Amifostine was well tolerated and only 1 patient suffered from gastrointestinal discomfort, blood pressure remained unchanged in all patients.
Amifostine prevented a significant reduction of creatinine clearance even in the 2 patients with known renal insufficiency: mean creatinine clearance was 125  +/-  20 ml/min prior to and 115  +/-  25 ml/min after chemotherapy.
In the control group, however, creatinine clearance dropped from 121  +/-  30 ml/min to 85  +/-  20 ml/min after completion of MVEC chemotherapy.
Serum creatinine levels did not increase significantly (1.1 mg/dl prior to and 1.2 mg/dl after chemotherapy), magnesium levels did not decrease significantly and normalized at the end of chemotherapy.
Significant neutropenia and thrombocytopenia developed in 29 % and 12 % of the patients in the amifostine group and in 67 % and 33 % of the patients in the control group.
Amifostine was shown to have a protective effect against cisplatin induced nephrotoxicity in the elderly patient undergoing systemic chemotherapy.
Based on our data amifostine should be applied in the supportive management to prevent chemotherapy induced complications.
The diagnosis of leptomeningeal dissemination of chronic lymphatic leukemia (CLL) by conventional cytology is unreliable because cytomorphologic criteria of malignancy are often lacking.
Immunophenotyping of leukocyte differentiation antigens may also be of limited diagnostic value due to the small  number of cells in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) samples.
Molecular methods may support the specific diagnosis of leptomeningeal infiltration of CLL.
We present an 54 old patient who was diagnosed with CLL five years ago.
Despite clinical signs of leptomeningeal  involvement neither magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) nor conventional CSF analysis were suggestive of lymphomatous meningitis.
Using PCR we selectively amplified the highly variable and clone-specific CDR3 region of the locus encoding the immunoglobulin heavy chain (IgH) in DNA obtained from both CSF and peripheral blood cells.
Analysis of PCR products by high resolution gel electrophoresis revealed a single DNA fragment respectively indicating the presence of a  monoclonal cell population in both  compartments.
DNA sequence analysis of the amplified CDR3 segments confirmed the clonal identity of cells and the leptomeningeal dissemination of CLL.
In the orthopedic department of the University Hospital Homburg/Saar, we use since 1993 a computer-based system for clinics organisation and documentation of operations.
Hardware consists of DOS/Windows PC's in a Novell-network.
Our software is a combination of datbase-system for managing patient-data and a special coding program for ICD and IKPM-digits.
Our experience shows that computer assisted clinic-management is an effective tool to help the surgeon in planning and documentation.
Until now, we used the system for 31 500 patients and 8500 operations.
A flexible software can meet the requirements both of the surgeons and administration.
Moreover, in the University hospital Homburg/Saar, the different departments are linked by an Intranet with connection to other scientific networks and the Internet.
In one third of the little girls coming to the outpatient clinic for pediatric gynecology, a vulvovaginitis can be diagnosed.
Etiologic factors are poor perineal hygiene, foreign bodies in the vagina and respiratory or skin infections.
The microbiologic investigation often reveals staphylococci, streptococci, E. coli, and in case of chronical-recurrent discharge also B. fragilis and peptostreptococci.
The symptoms are itching, burning, dysuria, discharge and rubor of the vulva.
A systemic application of antibiotics is not necessary, a local treatment with antibiotic solutions is contraindicated and the usual vaginal suppositories are unsuitable for girls.
A desinfection often irritates the vulvovaginal region of little girls so that for years we use estriol ointment only which is tolerated.
Excellently, a single-dose application being sufficient; burning, itching and discharge disappear and the vaginal epithelium gets more resistant because of the estrogen influence, so that the healing process is accelerated.
The author gives a short overview of the psychodynamic and psychoanalytic basics of psychotherapy with guided affective imagery.
The differences of the imaginations of neurotic patients and patients with severe personality disorders are demonstrated and discussed.
Two clinical cases are described in detail which show the special elements of symbol formation on different levels of ego-structure.
Then the most important results of the recent infant research and the research of attachment behaviour, especially those of the group of Fonagy, and their importance for the theory of symbol formation are discussed.
The theory of potential space is used as a base for understanding imaginative processes.
General and special technical recommandations for the treatment of borderline cases with guided affective imagery are derived.
Especially the relationship to the theories of Bion, Ogden and Winnicott is estimated.
The situation of psychiatric patients in the Ukraine is determined by the financial and economic difficulties of this country.
In the larger cities, so-called polyclinics take care of ambulant psychiatric patients.
However, no other social psychiatric institutions exist.
Here, the modalities of hospital psychiatric treatment are discussed using the psychiatric hospitals in Kiev and Shitomir as examples.
Undertreatment is also a problem, because only a few psychopharmacological drugs are produced in the Ukraine.
Import of new psychopharmacological agents is hampered by economical problems.
Improving the availability of psychopharmacological drugs and the establishment of a social psychiatric network are major aims for psychiatrists working in Ukraine.
Renal lesions are frequently encountered in blunt pediatric abdominal trauma.
In this retrospective study, we analyzed the incidence of renal trauma in these trauma patients to determine which diagnostic and therapeutic approaches were most predictive.
From 1976 to 1996, 308 children sustaining blunt abdominal trauma were admitted to our department.
Patients were evaluated using abdominal paracentesis, ultrasonography, and urinary analysis.
In specific cases, IV urography, CT scan, and/or angiography were applied.
We used the Organ Injury Scale (OIS) for classification of renal trauma into five grades.
The result of a B-scan ultrasound examination is strongly dependent on the type of the used B-system, the chosen system parameters and the experience and critical analysis of the clinical investigator.
The estimation of quantitative acoustic parameters, independent of the type of the used B-system, is one way to overcome the subjective nature and the problems of the interpretation of B-scan images.
Results of a longitudinal study about the transition to retirement are presented.
329 persons were interviewed three times (quantitative study) and 20 persons conducted a semi-structured diary (qualitative study), covering in both groups a two-year period (from half a year before retirement to one and a half years after retirement).
They were asked about their subjective well-being (happiness, joy, satisfaction, stresses), their life situation and their personal, social and material resources.
The results show that the transition to retirement brings with it gains (leisure time) and losses (financial, social status), but overall maintains a high level of well-being.
Specific analyses point out inter-individual differences, risk factors and resources, like a high level of trait well-being, health, social networks and an optimistic outlook.
The diary analyses lead to specifications, more detailed process analyses and hypotheses about cohort effects.
Consequences for an adequate preparation for retirement are discussed.
Intraoperative complications can be divided into three categories on the basis of the time of their occurrence: Group I - Problems associated with access; group II: introduction of the endovascular stent (a: release of the main segment, b: anchoring the second limb); and group III: incidence of primary endoleaks.
Interferon alpha and gamma have been used to treat several hepatic, hematological and oncological diseases for years.
Recently, interferon beta has been introduced as a therapeutic agent in relapsing-remitting multiple sclerosis.
A 41-year-old female patient with multiple sclerosis developed non-tender, palm-sized, cutaneous-subcutaneous, reddish infiltrates at the injection sites on her thighs after 8 weeks of treatment with subcutaneous interferon beta injections.
Histopathology revealed a perivascular lymphoid infiltrate of the dermis and a subtle lobular lymphoid infiltrate of the subcutis.
Interferon beta therapy was discontinued for 4 weeks.
With topical corticosteroids, the skin lesions resolved.
When subcutaneous injections were resumed at a reduced dose, only erythema around injection sites developed without induration or pain.
Slight erythema and swelling at interferon beta injection site are frequent and rare cases of cutaneous necrosis have been described.
However, no reports of large, painful, cutaneous-subcutaneous infiltrates after interferon beta therapy have been published.
In adults, infectious spondylitis is a rare but severe disease, caused by a bacterial thrombus in tissue of reduced resistance.
In conventional radiographs initial findings are a narrowing of the intervertebral space, local osteoporosis and poorly defined erosive borders of the vertebral endplates.
These changings can be found at least three to six weeks after the onset of disease.
However, in Szintigraphy and MRT pathologic alterations are evident after ten to twelve days.
Thus, early diagnosis and treatment becomes possible.
In early stages of the disease a localized lysis surrounded by a reactive sclerosis appears in predisposed areas of the vertebral body (subchondral, anterobasal, ventral, central).
Apparently, a soft tissue tumor is associated.
Sclerosis and reduction of the soft tissue tumor are the first signs of repair processes.
After at least 12 weeks, computed tomography can reveal typical sintering of the vertebral body and occasionally the development of a bony sequester.
In addition, MRT as well as CT can be helpful in the detection and localization of complications as abscesses or affection of the vertebral canal.
The tuberculous spondylitis can sometimes cause difficulties in differential diagnosis.
Clinical findings, affection of several vertebral bodies, large soft tissue tumors with appearance of calcification as well as not typical locations are strongly suggestive of tuberculous spondylitis, but these findings are not specific of the disease.
Degenerative disorders such as erosive osteochondrosis or changings due to chronic dialysis (e. g. amyloid or crystal arthropathies) may cause even more problems in differential diagnosis.
Typical for a blastomatous process is the integrity of the interverebral disc space, which is a rare finding in spondylitis.
To show the possibilities of imaging diagnostic procedures using high and extremely high resolution ultrasonic probes we investigated the anatomic structures of the foot.
We examinated 10 cadaver foots of the anatomic institute and in a clinical trial 20 healthy patients with 10 to 20-MHz-probes and could identify correctly single tendons and ligaments even in the toe region.
Especially the possibility of dynamic examination had to be mentioned beside the other advantages of ultrasound diagnostic (saving of expenses, lack of radiation, side-to-side comparison).
An essential parameter for the incorporation of drugs and narcotics into head hair is the content of hair pigment (melanins).
Toxicological studies of hair should therefore take the colour of the hair into consideration.
As the available vocabulary for verbal characterisation is small and the description depends on the subjective opinion of the viewer, it was the purpose of this study to investigate if colorimetric measurements allow objectivation of hair colour.
The natural hair colour of 17 subjects was described subjectively in words and by comparing it with a hair colour chart (Wella, Darmstadt, Germany).
Subsequently the colours of the hair and the samples of the hair colour chart used for comparison were measured by colorimetric analysis and the CIEL*a*b* values were determined.
The descriptive categorisation of the hair colours (e.g.
blonde, brown, black) could often not be recognised in the colorimetric results.
Sometimes considerable differences were also found between the colour values of the natural hair samples and the specimens used for comparison.
When the colour measurements were repeated at intervals of several days the results were found to be reproducible.
We measured the ventilatory pattern and additional work of breathing (WOBadd) at three different levels of inspiratory pressure support [IPS 5, 10, 15 mbar above positive end-expiratory pressure (PEEP)] and in a new ventilatory mode, automatic tube compensation (ATC), in nine operative patients without lung injury nine patients ventilated for several following acute respiratory insufficiency (ARI).
In ATC, endotracheal tube resistance is compensated automatically by means of closed-loop control of the calculated tracheal pressure.
Pressure support in this mode, i. e. airway pressure above PEEP, is equal to the actual flow-dependent pressure drop across the endotracheal tube (ETT).
Airway pressure rises at the beginning of inspiration and falls towards the end.
As the tube resistance of ETT seriously hinders expiration and can cause desynchronization between ventilator and patient, airway pressure is reduced below PEEP during expiration in the same way as it is increased during inspiration.
The result is a near-constant tracheal pressure at PEEP both during inspiration and during expiration.
This mode could be best termed as "electronic extubation".
The most striking difference between the postoperative patients and the ARI patients was their minute ventilation (17.8+/-1.85 l/min in ARI patients vs 7.3+/-3.1 l/min in the postoperative patients).
In the postoperative patients augmentation of IPS from 5 to 15 mbar induced a steady increase in tidal volume (VT) and a consecutive decrease in respiratory rate (rr) compared with ATC (VTATC,postop= 463+/-78 ml; rrATC,postop =16+/-4 min-1; VTIPS5,postop = 505+/-79 ml; rrIPS5,postop = 15+/-4 min-1; VTIPS10,postop = 562+/-86 ml; rrIPS15,postop =14+/-4 min-1; VTIPS15,postop=660+/- 151 ml; rrTPS15, postop = 12+/-4 min-1), whereas the augmentation of IPS of 5 and 10 mbar in the ARI patients could not compensate for the increase in rr and the decrease in VT, after switching from ATC to IPS (VTATC,ARI 724+/-308 ml, rrATC,ARI = 24+/-6 min-1; VTIPS5,ARI = 649+/-315 ml; rrIPS 5,ARI = 27+/-8 min-1; VTIPS10,ARI=653+/-353 ml; rrIPS10,ARI = 25+/-8 min-1: Even IPS 15 was not able to reestablish VT at the values observed during ATC (VTIPS15,ARI =680+/-312 ml).
During ATC WOBadd was small in both postoperative and ARI patients (WOBadd,ATC,postop = 93+/-36 mJ/l, WOBadd,ATC,ARI =116 +/-72 mJ/l).
In the postoperative patients, an inspiratory pressure support of 5 mbar was not sufficient to compensate WOBadd compared with ATC.
However, IPS 10 and 15 mbar were able to compensate for WOBadd (WOBadd.ATC5,postop WOBadd,IPS5,postop =189+/-77 mJ/l; WOBadd,IPS10,postop = 55+/-30 mJ/l; WOBadd,IPS15,postop = 21+/-11 mJ/l).
In the ARI patients an IPS 5, 10 or 15 mbar was not sufficient to compensate for WOBadd (WOBadd,IPS 5,ARI = 1126+/-262 mJ/l; WOBadd,IPS 10,ARI 863+/-253 mJ/l; WOBadd,IPS 15,ARI 763+/-298 mJ/l).
Under ATC, WOBadd was only 15% of WOBadd under IPS of 15 mbar.
All but two patients were successfully extubated after the investigation.
These two patients were not extubated because they were dependent on an FIO2 >0.5.
Our results strongly indicate that ventilatory dependence in ARI patients may be caused by the ETT rather than by mechanical dysfunction of the lung.
ATC is a very helpful mode to use in distinguishing between ventilatory failure caused by ETT and real ventilatory dependence.
The preoperative localization of pharmaco-resistent focal epilepsies before surgery and the prognosis concerning seizure outcome are both of importance.
In addition to conventional MRI diagnostics for the detection of small epileptogenic lesions, proton magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging (HMR spectroscopy) can be useful for assessing the bilaterality of pathological changes in cryptogenic temporal lobe epilepsies.
The technique and findings of HMR spectroscopy are reported in patients with cryptogenic temporal lobe epilepsies.
The findings indicate that chemical shift imaging (CSI) investigations of the ipsilateral and contralateral hemispheres provide important information for the prediction of seizure outcome after epilepsy surgery.
This paper describes the conceptual considerations in planning and realizing an inpatient unit for traumatized patients.
The different concepts of the dynamic of the traumatic disease and the aetiopathology of posttraumatic stressdisease (PTSD) are highly significant in regard to the realisation of differing concepts of inpatient therapy of trauma.
The utilisation of Konzentrative Bewegungstherapy (KBT) and Creative Therapy in our conflict- and solution-oriented analytic concept permits us to neglect a fictitious contradiction between traumaexposure and traumalimitation and a "potential space" (Winnicott) can be opened to the creative work with the patients.
This paper illustrates with some casuistic examples the utilisation of KBT in transforming the traumatic body-flashbacks into narrative memory-scripts, by the use of symbolizing processes.
In 55 consecutive patients with the same dual chamber pacemaker (Relay, Intermedics) and different pacing leads, the influence of different safety margins for pacing on battery current was investigated.
2.8 +/- 0.9 years after implantation, atrial and ventricular pulse-width thresholds (tRS) (ms) were determined at 0.5, 1.0, and 2.0 V, and the charge delivered at threshold was telemetered.
If tRS was <1.50 ms at 0.5 V, an amplitude of 1.0 V was programmed in the atrium and the ventricule; if tRS was <1.50 ms at 1.0 V, then an amplitude of 2.0 V was chosen.
Two times the charge threshold (2x QRS), two times the voltage threshold (2x URS), and three times the pulse-width threshold (3x tRS) were programmed as the safety margins for pacing.
With every safety margin, battery current (IRS) (µA) was averaged from 5 telemetric readings in D00 mode with 70 bpm.
IBat was significantly lower with 2x QRS as compared with 2x URS (13.43 +/- 1.0 vs. 14.20 +/- 1.2 µA, p<0.01) and as compared with 3x tRS (13.99 +/- 1.2 µA, p<0.05).
Pacemaker longevity derived from these current data was significantly longer with 2x QRS (112 +/- 8 months) as compared with 2x URS (106 +/- 9, p<0.01) and as compared with 3x tRS (108 +/- 8, p<0.05).
If current consumption is compared intraindividually in dependance on the programmed amplitude, battery current is significantly lower at 1.0 V as compared with 2.0 V resulting in a mean reduction of 0.63 µA (-4.9%, p<0.05) and an average gain in longevity of 5 months.
This applies to every safety margin tested.
Differences in battery current caused by the safety margins will translate into a greater gain in longevity in future pacemaker models with reduced internal current consumption.
Any medical procedure must be legally authorized by the patient, giving informed consent.
This prerequisite is based on the right to self determination.
Otherwise a medical procedure is considered as physical injury.
Thus, the way, how a specific procedure is performed, predominantly depends on the patient's will.
The attending physician's duty is to find out this will, which is especially important when old patients and patients incapable of giving valid consent are involved.
Before the procedure the physician has to have a confidential talk with the patient.
He has to point out the best treatment possible considering the individual circumstances of the patient's life.
The physician has to find out, weather the patient is competent to refuse or consent to treatement.
Furthermore the consultation is an opportunity to diminish the patient's fear and to increase his confidence.
The main problem treating old patients is that they often lack the mental ability for appreciation of the nature of the situation.
One has to differentiate between the physiological mental decay and dementia or psychiatric diseases.
In these cases a third party consent is necessary.
This review of German neurology during the Nazi era mentions first the significance of Jewish neurologists for the history of the specialty, and the irreplaceable loss that their expulsion from Germany represented.
A brief discussion of the scientific accomplishments of German neurologists during this time is followed by a description of violations of ethical principles, exemplified by the human experiments of G. Schaltenbrand.
The spirit of the age exerted a malevelent influence.
A postal survey targeted at 1000 firms in the metal- and electronic working industry of Northrhine Westfalia was carried out by Sozialforschungsstelle Dortmund und Institute of geronotology to analyze the implementation of the collective agreement concerning partial retirement.
As the results show, firms in Northrhine Westfalia are willing to accept the collective agreement and use partial retirement though there are still problems left to solve.
Firms are further using partial retirement as an instrument of early retirement.
Therefore partial retirement is created as a so-called "blocked model".
From February 1991 to May 1998, 340 patients had a cardioverter/defibrillator (ICD) implanted.
Mean age was 64  +/-  9 years, 278 male and 62 female.
60% of patients had coronary artery disease and 31% dilative cardiomyopathy.
Ejection fraction was 38  +/-  14%.
The indication for an implantable cardioverter/defibrillator was in 57% of patients ventricular tachycardia, in 43% ventricular fibrillation.
298 patients had a single-chamber cardioverter/defibrillator implanted, 42 patients a dual-chamber cardioverter/defibrillator.
In 25 patients additional subcutaneous patch or array electrodes and in 2 patients additional epicardial patch electrodes were implanted.
Implantation site was in 92 patients abdominal and in 248 pectoral.
Over a period of 7 years 34 lead-related complications occured in 33 patients (9.7%), after a median of 2 months after implantation.
Diagnosis was made by routine chest x-ray in about 55% of lead-related complications, by clinical presentation (inadequate therapy, pain) in 24%, and by electrical parameters in 21%.
In patients with an abdominal implantation site, lead-related complications occurred in 20%, in contrast to 6% in patients with a pectoral implantation site.
Regarding patients with pectoral implantation site, lead-related complications were observed in 12% of patients with a dual-chamber ICD vs 4% with a single-chamber ICD (p = 0.05), due to dislocation of atrial electrodes with dual-chamber ICD.
There were no differences in clinical parameters between patients with pectoral vs abdominal and between single vs dual-chamber ICD.
Several new approaches are available for early defibrillation.
One example is semiautomatic defibrillators used by the first arriving emergency staff.
The recommendations for introducing emergency medical technician (EMT) defibrillation in Germany are based either on the results in cities with so called doctor-manned-ambulances or the experiences of the German multi-center-study.
This analysis intends to contribute data to an EMT defibrillation program in cities with a so called rendezvous-system.
Methods: In a prospective study a EMT-defibrillation group (= DG) was compared with a standard group (basic life support by EMTs and defibrillation by emergency physicians) (= SG) and a control group (emergency physicians starting resuscitation alone or together with EMTs) (= CG).
In the DG semiautomatic defibrillators from Laerdal (Heartstart 3000) were used.
Successfully resuscitated patients were followed up with the Glasgow Coma Scale (GCS), the Pittsburgh Brain Stem Score (PBSS), and Pittsburgh Cerebral (CPC) and Overall Performance Categorie (OPC).
Results: Over 13 months 43 patients were included, primarily presenting with ventricular fibrillation (VF).
Depending on the first arriving emergency staff the patients were allocated to the DG (n = 12), to the SG (n = 18) or to the CG (n = 13).
DG and SG did not differ significantly concerning the primary survival rate or the long-term prognosis (primary successful 8.3% vs. 38.9%, definite successful 0% vs. 27.8%).
The primary survival rate in the DG was significantly lower than in the CG (8.3% vs. 61.5%).
In the long term survival rate there were no significant differences.
In the DG significantly less patients received bystander CPR (8.3%) than in the other groups (55.6% and 69.2%).
Neither the variable "witnessed collapes" nor "bystander CPR" had a significant influence for the outcome of the patients in this study.
The average response time for the first arriving rescue team was 5.5 +/- 2.4 min, without a significant difference between the groups.
Conclusions: A comparison of this study with American, European and German recommendations for EMT defibrillation programms revealed some deviations.
Bystander CPR seems to be of special importance as well as the time interval between defibrillation and the arrival of the emergency physician.
A benefit of EMT defibrillation could not be demonstrated in our "rendezvous-system", possibly because the time interval was less than 4 min (3.5 min).
Since the result is in accordance with the German multi-center-study, a critical consideration of a EMT defibrillation program seems to be necessary in "Rendezvous-systems".
Ninety-two strains of glycopeptide-resistant enterococci (GRE) from 80 patients of 31 hospitals in 11 federal states were analyzed.
They were primarily isolated in intensive care units (general, surgical, internistic, pediatric, oncological ones), but also in nephrologic/dialysis or neurologic/orthopaedic wards.
A dominance of VanA type E. faecium strains was observed (n=81; 88.0%).
In addition, strains of E. faecalis (VanA; n=4; 4.4%), E. faecium (VanB; n=1; 1.1%), and E. gallinarum (VanC1, n=6; 6.5%) were found.
The 81 VanA strains of E. faecium possessed the following resistances to other antibiotics: erythromycin, ciprofloxacin (both 93.8%), ampicillin, oxytetracycline (both 88.9%), rifampicin (79.0%), trimethoprim/sulfameracin (61.7%), chloramphenicol (18.9%), fusidic acid (12.3%), quinupristin/dalfopristin (7.4%); gentamicin (46.9%) and streptomycin (37.0%), also together with ampicillin resistance (9.9-35.8%).
In some of these VanA type strains resistance to teicoplanin cannot be completely expressed in-vitro.
Macrorestriction analysis of E. faecium outbreak isolates (VanA type) from hospitals in different federal states indicated an intra- and interhospital spread of a defined strain.
However, heterogeneous plasmid and plasmid restriction patterns showed that these strains were not completely identical.
The scapulothoracic dissociation (SD) is a complex injury of the shoulder girdle, mostly associated with polytraumatized critically ill patients.
This case report of 3 patients shows the variety of possible injuries combined with SD.
Diagnosis and therapy in such a rare trauma, which is most likely seen in specialized trauma centres are being described.
The 3 patients are presented from trauma to management, with remarks to various possibilities in treatment.
Reports of other groups include multicenter studies with small numbers of patients, making it different to look for homogenity or defining standards, whereas current guidelines are being mentioned, including remarks on the management of these mostly polytraumatized and vitally endangered patients.
This is a case report on arthroscopic removal of a glass splinter from the knee joint of a 56-year-old male.
Recurrent hemarthrosis of the knee was the reason for differential diagnosis, as the patient could not remember any trauma.
After performing MRI, a 12 x 5 mm signal-free zone showed up in the area of the lateral condylus femoris, which was identified through arthroscopy as a glass splinter and removed.
The patient was discharged soon after without any complaints.
Many patients with acquired strabismus do not suffer from diplopia and confusion after an individually and age-dependent interval.
They inhibit the image of the deviated eye by binocular rilvary and particularly by the physiological ability to disregard visually disturbing stimuli.
Red cells, platelet concentrates and fresh frozen plasma of a single donation contain leucocytes, causing a lot of side effects.
Modern filtration- and apheresis-techniques lead to a reduction of residual leucocyte counts of <1x106 per unit.
The best method to achieve controlled and validated conditions is the blood bank performed standardised prestorage-filtration.
This is an effective method, to prevent cytokine-mediated and leucocyte-mediated febrile nonhaemolytic transfusion reactions (FNHTR), to prevent a primary immunisation to leucocyte- and histocompatibility-antigens, to avoid transmission of viral infections by blood transfusion, e.g.
Cytomegalovirus (CMV) and to exclude in special cases bacterial septicaemia.
In addition, there are references to reduce the postoperative infections, the rate of recurrence of a tumor and the postoperative complications in patients undergoing cardiac surgery.
The use of leucocyte-depleted blood components for special indications is meanwhile established.
Some European countries have made a decision for a general filtration of all blood components containing leucocytes.
The authors recommend the general leucocyte-depletion of blood components considering the German medical law (AMG) and cost/benefit ratio.
Evaluation of psychotherapeutic or psychopharmacological treatment frequently uses rating scales without regard for patients' defensiveness.
This study demonstrates on 309 psychotherapy patients treated with inpatient client-centered therapy and followed-up 1 year after treatment that defensiveness, measured with validity scales of personality inventories MMPI-K, FPI-R and Gießen-Test, influences ratings (scales CGI, HAMA, HAMD, BRMES) before and after therapy.
Patients who deny psychopathology on admission do so at discharge and to some extent at follow-up.
The extent of effect is significantly diminished with an increase in frankness in these patients, indicated by the significant improvement in validity scales.
Inpatient client-centered psychotherapy improved defensiveness in the case of initial self-criticism and diminished it in the case of initial retentiveness.
Introduction: Because of their frequency and consequences sciatica remains a demanding clinical entity with significant social and economical impact.
There is a high demand on therapeutic modalities, using folk medicine methods in the treatment of orthopaedic  diseases.
No data is available on the usefullness of methods like natural herbs in combination with acupuncture.
Aim of our study was to present data on the effect of acupuncture and cytokineinhibiting natural herbs in sciatic pain.
We compared these  results with nerve root infiltration by local anaesthetics and corticosteroids in our  orthopaedic outpatient clinic.
Materials and Results: 278 patients with chronic pain for at least 3 months were observed.
All three therapeutical modalities showed improvement of pain scores.
Best  results were gained with steroid injection (n=26; 66% pain reduction), acupuncture in combination with herbs improved the pain in average of 62% (n=230), whereas injection with local anaesthetic had a pain reduction of 48% (n=22).
Sole Mepivacain-HCl treatment had significant less pain reduction compared to the other treatment modalities.
Conclusion: According to our results acupuncture in combination with herbs and  steroid nerve blocks appear to be an effective and thus recommendable conservative  therapy in cases of sciatic pain.
Taking into account that patients increasingly prefer ethnomedical modalities of treatment our study gains importance for practising  orthopaedists.
This paper concerns advances in the integration of psychotherapy in psychiatric education and clinical practice and whether they go along with increasing research activities.
To find answers, a survey on psychotherapy research was carried out in all German psychiatric hospitals and departments by means of a questionnaire.
The results indicate that psychotherapy research is done nearly exclusively in university hospitals.
About half of them had already published psychotherapy studies and two thirds of them are presently carrying out studies, mostly including prospective, randomized clinical trials.
These studies cover the whole spectrum of psychiatric disorders: substance abuse, schizophrenic and affective disorders, anxiety, and obsessive compulsive and personality disorders.
To improve psychotherapy research conditions further, efforts are necessary to increase scientific exchange, financial support, and the integration of institutions outside the universities.
There is little to suggest that the course of preeclamsia can be substantially affected by drug treatment.
The vast majority of randomized studies do not indicate beneficial effects of antihypertensive treatment on proteinuria, fetal heart rate abnormalities, abruptio placentae and the incidence of preterm birth.
There is also no definite effect on the development of superimposed preeclampsia, HELLP syndrome, renal failure or eclampsia.
Moreover, blood pressure lowering agents fail to improve uteroplacental perfusion but may have adverse effects on fetal growth.
Antihypertensive treatment is only indicated in severe hypertension ( > 170/110 mm Hg) to reduce the risk of cerebral hemorrhage.
Dihydralazine injections may result in reduced placental blood flow and fetal distress.
Oral nifedipine offers some advantages in view of more potent vasodilator actions on uterine and fetoplacental vessels and a lower incidence of fetal distress.
Increasing evidence suggests that the mechanism of eclamptic seizure is cerebral vasoconstriction with resultant ischemia.
Cerebral vessels are particularly sensitive to magnesium, which works by reversing cerebral vasoconstriction with resultant improvement in blood flow.
Controlled trials have shown magnesium to be superior to both placebo and phenytoin for the prevention of eclampsia.
Furthermore, magnesium has been found to be more effective than diazepam and phenytoin in preventing recurrence of seizures in women with eclampsia.
Also the neonatal outcome favors magnesium, which is now generally accepted as the drug of choice for the prevention and treatment of eclampsia.
Baker's cysts were treated operatively in 19 patients in the Department of Traumatology of the University of Cologne from 1988 to 1997.
The subjective and objective results were evaluated with a questionnaire and a clinical examination and sonography (follow-up: 95 %).
All patients were examinated before surgery, sonography and X-ray of the knee were performed.
We differentiated between the congenital primary cyst (39 %), and the secondary form, which was always associated with an intraarticular lesion (61 %).
Arthroscopy was performed in all secondary forms of Baker's cyst.
Postoperative complications were two reinterventions due to one hematoma and one effusion.
Patient's evaluation of operation result was "excellent" in 61 % and "good" in 39 % of cases.
All knee joints had a full range of motion.
There was only one case of a recurrent cyst.
The primary form of Baker's cyst has always to be extirpated, according to our clinical experience.
The extirpation of the secondary Baker's cyst and the relevance of arthroscopy and treatment of the basic disease have to be discussed.
In median avcuate ligament syndrome, compression of the celiac artery is caused by an abnormally low insertion of the median arcuate ligament in the presence of normally located celiac and superior mesenteric arteries.
A lot of controversy exists concerning the indication for operation and the best mode of treatment.
Depending on the presence and quality of collateral pathways, the symptoms vary considerably.
We report a rare case of arcuate ligament syndrome with two-vessel involvement.
In such cases surgical treatment seems to offer substantial benefit.
Usually transsection of the compressing arcuate ligament is sufficient.
Bypass procedures should remain limited to cases in which transsection does not enable a significant increase in splanchnic blood flow.
The microscopic examination of Giemsa-stained blood films for the diagnosis of malaria is a highly sensitive technique.
However, the expertise required is a major disadvantage.
Recently, methods not dependent on microscopy have become commercially available.
The use of an antigen-capture assay for the detection of histidine-rich protein 2, an antigen specific for Plasmodium falciparum, forms the basis of the ParaSight-F (Becton Dickinson) and the ICT Malaria Pf test (ICT Diagnostics).
Parasite lactate dehydrogenase is the basis of another immunographic dipstick assay developed by Flow Inc.
These currently available assays have been evaluated in a number of trials giving sensitivities and specificities of 90-100%.
A decreased sensitivity is found in cases with low parasitemia.
However, false-negative  results have also been reported in patients with high parasite densities.
Purpose: Discussion in the literature of peripheral nerve lesions after surgical treatment is based mainly on orthopedic surgery or on ischemic syndromes.
There is no information about the frequency of nerve lesions after revascularization of the lower limb.
Methods: Between 1992 and 1996, 436 patients underwent peripheral arterial revascularization, including 147 cases of deep revascularization, 127 supra-genicular femoro-popliteal bypasses, 116 infra-genicular femoro-popliteal bypasses and 56 femoro-crural bypasses.
Mean patient age was 70.5 +/- 5.8 years; 182 patients were female and 254 were male.
There was a 38% rate (166/436) of reoperation.
All patients were examined based on anamnestic information and a detailed clinical neurological investigation, including the methods of Weber and Moberg.
Results: We found eleven patients (4%) with peripheral nerve lesions after the primary operation.
After the reoperation 55 patients (33%) had nerve lesions.
Conclusions: Peripheral nerve lesions with sensory disturbance were present in 15% of our patients on discharge from hospital.
They had mainly dysesthesia and hypesthesia but no kind of motor dysfunction.
In our opinion, detailed preoperative information is very important because of the risk of sensitive nerve lesions.
Classic and HIV-associated Kaposi's sarcoma (KS) are predominantly found in male Caucasians.
It is unclear why KS is so rare in women.
At the Department of Dermatology, University of Frankfurt, epidemic KS was diagnosed in 299/751 (40%) male and 5/72 (18%) female HIV-infected patients.
To detect common parameters regarding immunodeficiency, hormonal disturbances, abnormalities in clinical course, or sexual practices, data of eight women with KS (five HIV+, three HIV-) were compared.
In HIV+ women KS is more aggressive than in HIV- women and more aggressive than in HIV+ men.
Early and frequent visceral involvement and no preference for the lower extremities are found.
Compared to HIV- women with KS, HIV+ women are generally younger (mean age 38 vs 71 years) and significantly immunodeficient (reduced absolute CD4 cell count and CD4/CD8 ratio).
All women with KS investigated for sexual hormones (7/8) showed abnormalities: 7/7 had low oestrogens, 4/6 low LH and 3/5 low progesterone.
Controls (n=11, HIV+ without KS) showed a clear trend for higher serum levels of sexual hormones, but the difference was not significant.
Although different reasons for low levels of oestrogens (drug abuse, marasmus, menopause) must be considered, the lack of oestrogens seems to be a common finding in HIV+ and HIV- women with KS.
There was no correlation between sexual practices (anal or oral-faecal contacts) and the manifestation or aggressiveness of KS.
The aim of the study was the assessment of left ventricular (LV) systolic function and left ventricular mass following aortic valve replacement (AVR) due to aortic valve stenosis as well as the influence of regression of LV hypertrophy in patients with normal and impaired LV systolic function prior to surgery.
74 patients with severe aortic valve stenosis (29 female, 45 male, mean age 66  +/-  18 years) were divided into 2 groups according to LV ejection fraction (EF): Group 1 with EF > 50% (n = 40); Group 2 with EF <= 50% (n = 34).
Furthermore, patients were differentiated into a group A without (n = 53) and a group B with aortic regurgitation (<= II °, n = 21).
All patients were examined by transthoracic echocardiography before and 1 month after surgery.
There was a significant decrease of LV enddiastolic and endsystolic valume indices following AVR in group 2 and group B.
Patients with preoperatively lower EF (group 2) showed an increase in LV ejection fraction from 39  +/-  10% before AVR to 47  +/-  11% after AVR (p < 0.001), whereas patients with preoperative normal EF (group 1) showed a significant decrease in EF (from 62  +/-  8% to 57  +/-  10%, p < 0.05).
Also patients with combined aortic valve disease before AVR had an increase of EF after surgery (from 45 %plusmn; 14% to 56  +/-  14%, p < 0.03).
There were significant decreases of interventricular septum thickness and LV posterior wall thickness in group 1 and group A, whereas a significant decrease of LV anddiastolic diameter index was noted only in group B.
Improvement of the NYHA functional class could be demonstrated in group 2 from 2.8  +/-  0.7 before to 2.2  +/-  0.6 after AVR, as well as in group B from 2.9  +/-  0.7 before to 1.9  +/-  0.7 after surgery.
In conclusion, patients with impaired LV function or combined aortic valve disease showed a significant improvement of left ventricular systolic function after AVR, while patients with normal LV function presented a slight decrease of EF.
There was a significant regression of left ventricular muscle mass in all groups independent of the left ventricular functional status.
Cardiomyocytes lose the ability to proliferate after birth.
Subsequently, irreversible cellular damage, e.g., during myocardial infarction, causes loss of functional properties and cell replacement by fibrotic tissue.
It is, therefore, not surprising that cell replacement strategies such as cardiomyocyte transplantation in damaged myocardium or scar tissue has gained widespread interest.
In other species such as mice, rats, and dogs, the technical feasibility of skeletal myoblast-, satellite cell-, and fetal cardiomyocyte engraftment into normal and diseased myocardium has been demonstrated by simple injection methods.
Repeatedly, it has been shown that transplanted cells may survive for weeks within host myocardium and build intercellular connections such as grap junctions and desmosomes.
In contrast, grafthost connections have not, as yet, been convincingly demonstrated.
Hypothetically, cell transplants might exhibit the following functional properties: stabilization of diseased tissue to prevent structural remodeling; carrier for recombinant proteins, growth factors or drugs to induce molecular alterations of host myocardium; and improvement of regional and global myocardial function due to active contractility.
However, clear evidence of coordinated contractility of transplanted cells, and, thus, of a clinically relevant therapeutical use of cardiomyocyte transplantation as a replacement strategy for damaged host cardiac cells, remains to be demonstrated.
Concomitant with advances in medicine, involving the development and use of antibiotics, immunosuppressive drugs, organ / stem cell transplantation and pre-existing illnesses such as AIDS, the frequency of fungal infection has increased dramatically.
These factors determine the susceptibility of the lung for an acute or chronic course of disease.
Purpose: We evaluated the speed of sound (SOS) and broadband ultrasound attenuation (BUA) at the os calcis as an indicator of osteoporosis and observed the age-related changes in ultrasound values in normal women.
Materials and methods: BUA and SOS were measured in 236 women using the "Achilles" densitometer (Lunar, Madison, Ohio).
From the BUA and SOS values the BUA/SOS Index ("Stiffness" Index) is calculated.
We investigated 55 female patients with osteoporosis (aged 43-85 years) and 181 healthy women (aged 20-80 years).
Results: Ultrasound values for women with osteoporosis were significantly lower than those for the normal control group.
The Z-score compared with young normals was higher for the BUA/SOS Index (-3.1) than for BUA (-2.5) and SOS (-3.0).
At a BUA/SOS Index of 68 the sensitivity was 85 %, and the specificity was 77 % for patients with osteoporotic fractures.
We found a significant decline with age in SOS (r = -0.55), BUA (r = -0.50) and BUA/SOS Index (r = -0.57).
Conclusion: Ultrasound bone densitometry at the os calcis can be used as a screening test in the diagnosis of osteoporosis.
A treatment procedure requires the consent of the patient, but this is legally effective only if he is capable of giving his consent and can be informed accordingly.
Because of demographic development and the progress of medicine, the number of patients who are not able to give their consent is increasing.
In practice, we make do with the presumed consent of the patient or, for procedures that can wait, with the consent of legitimate family members.
An initiative action is suggested by physicians and hospitals that should reduce this gray zone and the forensic risks drastically.
A number of studies has shown a significant relationship between life events/life conditions and depression.
However, there is only a small number of studies investigating the effect of life events/life conditions in patients with severe depression from the endogenous subtype.
The present study examines the significance of the patients' life events/life conditions for the two year outcome of the illness in a prospective study with assessments every three months.
Patients are compared to healthy controls with regard to the period three months prior to the admission to the hospital at the index episode.
The results confirm the importance of life events and life conditions for the long term outcome of depressed patients with endogenous subtype respectively severe major depression in-patients.
Relapsers show considerably more undesirable life conditions than non-relapsers three to six months prior to their relapse.
Depressed patients indicate significantly more undesirable life events and life conditions and fewer desirable life conditions in comparison to the control group for the time span three months prior to their hospitalisation.
Since the availability of protease inhibitors in 1997, there has been a great change in antiretroviral therapy but also new long term side effects have emerged, mainly metabolic changes such as hypertriglyceridemia, hypercholesterinemia and hyperglycemia.
Besides, fat redistribution has been observed.
Fat wastes in the face and limbs but accumulates in the adipose tissue of the dorsocervical and abdominal region and the breasts.
The mechanism of these changes remains unclear.
For therapy a protease inhibitor free therapy or lipid lowering drugs may be tried.
29 of our 224 patients developed lipodystrophy.
27 of these patients had been treated with a protease inhibitor (17 patients with indinavir); 2 of the patients had never received protease inhibitors.
Background: The Low-Vision-Enhancement-System (LVESR) is the first binocular optoelectronic rehabilitation device with variable focus distance.
DNA-cytophotometry is one of the methods that may contribute to a more precise evaluation of the biological behaviour of tumours in addition to the WHO-classification.
In this study 121 tumour specimens of 50 patients suffering from gliomas with one or up to three recurrencies were investigated.
In all cases the histological type and WHO-grade and the Ki-67/MIB1 labeling index were determined.
DNA cytophotometry was performed after single cell preparation on Feulgen-stained preparations, and the following parameters were calculated: stemline ploidy, 5c-exceeding rate, and 2c-deviation index.
There is a world-wide renaissance of neurosurgical treatments of Parkinson's disease (PD), based on substantial progress in basic sciences.
A model of parallel motor circuitry has identified potential targets for lesioning by clarifying the pathophysiological role of the basal ganglia in PD.
The internal globus pallidus (Gpi) is an essential player as it connects to thalamocortical projections and can be disinhibited by overactivity of the nucleus subthalamicus (Nst).
Lesioning of these targets has been successful in MPTP damaged primates.
There is clinical use of destructive as well as restorative and stimulative technics.
Pallidotomy and thalamatomy have evolved by the use of better neuroradiological and electrophysiological targeting.
The first technic is used for treatment of rigidity, hypokinesia and dyskinesias, the latter one has proven to be efficient for tremor.
Dopaminergic reinnervation and increased dopaminergic output of the striatum has only been seen after transplantation of fetal cells; this method however carries immunological and ethical problems.
The continuous high frequency stimulation of basal ganglia is the newest technic; it is highly adaptable to the patient's need and carries a low morbidity profile.
Thalamic stimulation is used for the treatment of tremor.
The stimulation of Nst and Gpi are proposed for dyskinesias and on/off phenomena.
Animal research further focuses on xenotransplantation and implantation of genetically transformed cells or pluripotent precursor cells.
- In summary neurosurgical procedures seem to be verey promising; however longterm comparison studies are needed to define the best (combination) treatment(s) for the future.
Concepts of documentation rely not only on the contents required and technical demands, but the procedures covered and in medical applications especially security aspects are also matters of critical concern.
Even though the need for effective documentation (i.e., adequate in content, availability, feasibility and easy to retrieve analysis) is not a question, tasks and aims (for example, quality of patient care) deserve attention and establishing efforts have to be analyzed regarding their structural and personal prerequisites and implications before particular tools for documentation can be developed.
The Medtronic Thera/Thera-i (and Kappa 400) pacemakers utilize a mode switching algorithm that switches from the DDD/R mode to the DDIR mode in the presence on an atrial tachyarrhythmia.
To accomplish this, the pacemaker keeps track of a mean atrial rate (MAR) which is a weighted index of the atrial rate.
Once the MAR is greater than the programmed mode switch rate the pacemaker mode switches to the nontracking mode.
Because the algorithm weights faster atrial rates more heavily than slow atrial rates, the algorithm is sensitive to a wide variety of atrial tachyarrhythmias, including those with varying amplitudes.
Additionally, the algorithm provides a long PVARP and a rate adaptive (RA) AV interval.
These not only help ensure that a wide range of atrial rates will be detected, but may also limit the time the patient tracks at the upper rate before mode switching.
In order to assess the effectiveness of the algorithm, the Thera-i provides detailed diagnostics which provide information on the date, time, duration, and rate of the mode switch episodes.
Additionally, more detailed beat-to-beat information is provided for each episode which can help determine its appropriateness and can assist in making programming changes.
There is a lot of information in the literature about psychological disturbances in somatic diseases.
For dermatological patients such data are not available.
In early spring 1998 we studied the psychological changes in 247 hospitalized patients in the dermatological department of the Ruhr University Bochum.
We used the German version of the internationally accepted Hospital Anxiety and Depression Scale.
We found the prevalance of psychological alterations ranged between 25,9% and 31%.
The prevalence of psychological disturbances was a little higher than that seen in oncological, cardiological or neurological patient populations.
Surprisingly skin cancer patients were less affected than patients with chronic inflammatory or angiological diseases.
These results underline the necessity of improved psychological therapeutical strategies which must be standardized and evaluated.
In an analysis of 3,838 restrained car drivers, the proportion of acceleration related injury of the cervical spine increased from under 10 % in 1985 to over 30 % in 1997.
These injuries occurred mainly in the case of head-on or multiple collisions.
Letters were sent to 1,136 of the injured persons, and of the 138 patients who returned the questionnaires, 121 (88 %) were still suffering from their symptoms.
It was a question of pain (74 %), tension (6 %) and stiffness (5 %) in the head (27 %), neck (55 %) and shoulder (8 %) area.
The duration of the complaints was the longest after multiple collisions.
In addition to a slight influence of the accompanying injuries on the duration of complaints, the individual constitution seems to be an important determining factor.
In order to resolve the difficulties of conducting of this retrospective study, prospective studies are necessary which include documentation of diagnosis, treatment protocols, duration and type of complaints.
Large B-cell neoplasms represent one of the most frequent groups of non-Hodgkin-lymphomas (30-40%).
They are characterised by an aggressive clinical course.
These lymphomas may evolve either de novo or secondary during the course of a less aggressive lymphoma.
In addition to primary nodal, a primary extranodal manifestation is rather common.
The neoplastic cells, even within one given case, show a broad morphological spectrum.
Several findings of the last two decades have revealed that the large B-cell lymphomas represent an inhomogeneous group.
This fact has been taken into account by the new WHO classification of malignant lymphomas.
There are two groups identified, that of the variants and that of the subtypes.
The various variants (centroblastic, immunoblastic, anaplastic, T-cell/histiocyte-rich) correspond to lymphomas without reproducible discriminating criteria lacking characteristic clinical, immunophenotypical and genetic findings.
In contrast, the primary mediastinal, the intravascular, the primary effusion and primary central nervous system lymphomas represent distinct disease entities.
A number of recently described large cell lymphoma types, i. e. plasmablastic, ALK-positive and primary gastric, are included in the classification, their designation as distinct entities is still under discussion.
In the presented study, knee joint proprioception of 43 patients with a patellar pain syndrome of the knee joint was evaluated.
In a control group, the proprioception of 30 healthy volunteers with clinical and anamnestic inconspicous knee joints was examined.
We tested the proprioceptive capability of the subjects with a passive angle reproduction test.
Additionally, all knee joints were measured with and without an elastic knee bandage.
The patient group showed significant deterioration of angle reproduction capability (13.2  °  +/-  6.1  °) compared to the control group (7.8  °  +/-  2.8  °).
After applying an elastic knee bandage, the angle reproduction capability significantly improved to 9.2  °  +/-  4.5  °.
Proprioception of the contralateral, noninvolved knee joint in the patients (11.6  °  +/-  6.3  °) was worse compared to the control group.
Applying an elastic knee bandage did not significantly improve the proprioception of the uninjured knee joint.
Atrial fibrillation is the most commonly encountered sustained arrhythmia in men.
It is associated with a two-fold mortality risk and an increased cost for health care providers.
The relative inefficacy and the risks of pharmacologic approaches to atrial fibrillation therapy have contributed to increasing efforts to address atrial fibrillation with curative ablative strategies.
Ablation approaches for atrial fibrillation focus on two alternate strategies: ablation of the substrate for initiation and ablation of the substrate for maintenance of atrial fibrillation.
It has been demonstrated that atrial fibrillation may be initiated by repetitive atrial premature beats originating from a single focus.
These ectopic foci can be mapped and ablated, thereby removing the substrate for initiation of atrial fibrillation.
Most often, these atrial premature beats arise from the pulmonary veins.
A challenge in trying to ablate the trigger is actually having enough spontaneous activity from the said focus throughout the electrophysiologic study.
To sidestep the need of mapping, pure anatomic approaches are currently under investigation to electrically isolate the pulmonary veins from the atrial myocardium by circumferential lesions.
In patients without a defined trigger for atrial fibrillation, efforts were made to ablate the substrate for maintenance of atrial fibrillation.
Strong evidence exists that atrial fibrillation is the result of multiple coexisting reentrant wavelets requiring a critical myocardial mass to perpetuate.
Several working groups demonstrated that intraoperative compartmentalization of the myocardial tissue by surgical incisions or radiofrequency pulses is highly effective in preventing atrial fibrillation.
Currently, attempts were made to reproduce the surgical technique using transveneous, catheter-based approaches.
Though our knowledge of ablation techniques and technical prerequisites is continuously increasing, the difficulty to produce complete linear lesions in the left atrium and local thrombus formation at the ablation line are problems that are still not solved.
Using a time-budget method in a 3 year longitudinal study with a control group design, substantial reductions in the engagement of non-obligatory instrumental, social, and leisure activities could be found in a group of mildly to moderately demented patients.
Controlling these changes for differences in baseline paramters, the dementia-specific reduction was about 1,5 hours compared to a non-psychiatric control group.
These clinically relevant changes in activity levels underscore the importance of these activity domains with regard to the development of diagnostically useful indicators at the early stages of dementia.
Time-budget methods seem to be particularly useful to close the diagnostic gap with regard to the assessment of everyday competence indicators especially at early stages of the dementia illness.
Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy (HCM) is a disease with different etiological, morphological, functional, clinical and therapeutic aspects.
Recent investigations indicate that HCM is considerably widespread in the population (1:500).
The causes seem to generate from familial or sporadic abnormalities (mutations).
Depending on the clinical aspect, the complaints, and on the basis of morphologic and hemodynamic investigational results, we mainly have to consider two types of medical and surgical management.
Atrial fibrillation is in 20-50% the most frequent dysrhythmia after coronary artery bypass grafting (CABG) and a possible cause for hemodynamical complications and prolongation off the medical treatment in patients.
Therefore, the effect of -blocking with metoprolol for prevention of supraventricular arrhythmias (SVA) was investigated in a prospective and randomized trial.
200 patients after CABG were randomized in a drug and control group (average age 63.2 years, 154 male, 46 female).
Patients of the drug group (n=100) were treated with metoprolol (1mg/kg/BW) beginning on day one after operation, whereas patients of the control group (n=100) received therapy only in case of occurrence of atrial fibrillaton.
ECG, blood pressure, and electrolyte concentrations were measured regulary until the tenth day after surgery.
Reasons for exclusion were an ejection fraction (< 30%, SA- and AV-block or simultaneous application of epinephrine and metoprolol.
There were no significant differences between the patients of drug and control group with respect to age, sex ejection fraction, previous medication, number and type of bypass grafts, cardiopulmonary bypass time, and perioperative ischemic events.
However, a statistically significant difference was seen in the occurrence of supraventricular arrhythmias in both groups, 4 patients of the therapy group (4%) in contrast to 37 patients of the control (37%) developed supraventricular arrhythmias during the postoperative observation period (p<0.0001).
Both groups differed in total time of hospital stay by 1.5 days (control group: 9.83 +/- 2.88 days; drug group: 8.42 +/- 2.81 days), which was statistically significant (p<0.05).
All patients of the drug group could be discharged with a stable sinusrhythm, whereas 7 patients of the control group were discharged with persistent atrial fibrillation.
The difference was statistically significant as well (p<0.01).
Neither typical side effects of metoprolol, nor AV-blocks, bradycardia (f<60/min) or symptoms of low blood pressure could be observed.
The conclusion of this trial is a recommendation for a preventive application of 50mg metoprolol/day after coronary artery bypass surgery, which can reduce the incidence of SVA as well as the hospital stay statistically significant.
Especially by using the "Functional Muscular Diagnostics" described by Janda specific muscular imbalances can be found.
The method is easy to apply and should be used during and before the championship season.
Background: Angiotensin converting  enzyme-inhibitors (ACE-inhibitors) alter the function of the renin-angiotensin-aldesterone-system, which regulates the angiotensin II synthesis.
Angiotensine II is known to be a potent vasoconstrictor.
ACE-inhibitors are used as a standard treatment of arterial hypertension concerning the WHO-guidelines.
The experiences concerning the use of ACE-inhibitors in pediatric patients are  limited.
The frequency of side-effects are not known on a sufficient scientific basis.
Evoked potentials (EP) are a valuable tool when assessment of neurocritical care patients is impaired by loss of consciousness and lack of co-operation.
Different modalities of short latency EP can be applied to evaluate sensory, auditory and visual systems.
In this review we discuss EP studies in patients with thrombosis of basilar artery, space occupying cerebellar infarction and supratentorial mass lesions of different aetiology.
Paclitaxel, a potent anti-tumor agent, shifts the cytoskeleton equilibrium towards assembly of altered and extraordinarily stable microtubules.
These cellular modifications lead to reduced proliferation, migration, and signal transduction.
It is highly lipophilic, which promotes a rapid cellular uptake, and has a long-lasting effect in the cell due to the structural alteration of the cytoskeleton.
This makes paclitaxel a promising candidate for local drug delivery intended to address the proliferative and migratory processes involved in restenosis.
In this article, results of our in vitro and in vivo studies with paclitaxel are presented.
Cell culture experiments with monocultures of human arterial smooth muscle cells as well as cocultures with human endothelial cells showed that paclitaxel leads to an almost complete growth inhibition within a dose range of 1.0-10.0µmol/l, even after a short (20 min) single dose application.
The comparison of an active, semi-active, and passive delivery system (porous balloon, microporous balloon, and double balloon) favored the double balloon for the following in vivo experiments.
Tubulin staining and electron microscopy enabled visualization of paclitaxel-induced vessel wall alterations.
In the rabbit model, locally delivered paclitaxel resulted in reduced neointima formation and enlargement in vessel size; in the pig model, however, after stenting, this inhibition was not significant.
Both reduced proliferation and enlargement in vessel size contribute to a preservation of vessel shape and are likely to be caused by a structural alteration of the cytoskeleton, which is also supported by vascular contraction force experiments.
Atopic eczema is one of the most frequent dermatological diseases, with a still increasing incidence.
Although its etiopathogenesis is still not completely understood, a variety of triggering factors are known.
The following case report describes the clinical course of atopic dermatitis in a 2-year-old boy in whom both IgE-mediated allergic reactions and psychological factors were involved in triggering and maintenance of skin lesions.
This demonstrates how important both dermatological therapy and close cooperation with the field of psychosomatic medicine can be.
Identity development in adolescence may act as stressor triggering juvenile psychotic episodes.
A model is being presented stating that self development in subjects with high vulnerability for psychosis leads to the establishment of an "imaginary self" consisting of phantasies and fictions without taking into account facts and social realities.
The "imaginary self" stabilizes irritating self deficiencies, thus leading to a vulnerability for depersonalisation and identity diffusion during actual turmoils of adaptation.
Biomaterials are defined as non-living materials which are used in interaction with biological systems.
Especially in the field of urology, biomaterials are applied in urinary diversion, urinary incontinence, erectile dysfunction, and as cosmetic prostheses.
Biomaterial-tissue interaction is caused by the physical and chemical characteristics of the biomaterial, its degradation, and the resulting protein denaturation.
General requirements include biocompatibility and functionality and the avoidance of carcinogenic, mutagenic, toxic, and allergic reactions.
This ist most important when there is permanent contact between urine and epithelial tissue, which may lead to biofilminfection and incrustation.
Continuous modification of known materials, inauguration of new materials, as well as the possibilities of tissue engineering will determine their development in the years to come.
Hitherto the question of an indication for psychoanalytic group psychotherapy has not been clarified sufficiently.
In this paper, under the premise, that psychoanalytic group psychotherapy is a treatment mode in its own right, the issue is investigated which patients might best profit from the group treatment method.
It is pointed out that the group process itself contains a variety of therapeutic treatment factors which cannot be facilitated through psychoanalytic treatment of just one patient.
First, a series of diagnostic, structural, motivational and cognitive indication criteria are discussed.
Second, the moments of a capacity for cohesion and aspects of social relatedness are considered as helpful tools for a formulation of an indication.
As cohesion - according to group treatment outcome research results - has to be viewed as correspondent to the helpful therapeutic alliance, in the context of group psychotherapy, the quest for indication is inextricably linked to patient selection and setting conditions.
The conclusion is that psychoanalytic group psychotherapy, would preferably be indicated for those patients who suffer from constraints of emotional competence as stemming from developmental deficits.
Purpose: To evaluate method- and user effects as well as the required time in the determination of left- and right ventricular ejection fractions in comparing manual and semiautomatic border detection of the endocardium.
The diagnosis of urinary tract infection in renal transplant patients is important because unrecognized bacterial infection may lead - in the worst case - to graft loss.
Between January 1995 and January 1997, we therefore obtained bladder catheter urine samples in 31 female allograft recipients when voided urine samples repeatedly showed pyuria (>=10 WC per microscope field (x40)) and significant bacteriuria (>=;105/ml) combined with vaginal contamination (plenty of squamous epithelial cells, mixed bacterial growth).
Results: In 55 % (17/31), diagnosis of urinary tract infection was confirmed by single bladder catheterization; in 26 % (8/31), urinary tract infection could be excluded, and in 19 % (6/31), bladder colonization without pyuria was found.
Thus, 45 % of the patients with abnormal voided urine samples did not need antimicrobials.
After single dose antibiotic therapy with 500 mg Ciprofloxacin, given immediately after catheterization, no infectious complications occurred.
Diagnostic single bladder catheterization is a simple, safe and - compared to suprapubic aspiration - barely invasive method for the diagnosis or exclusion of urinary tract infection in female renal transplant patients with higher risk for complications due to an acute bladder infection and non-conclusive voided urine samples.
Most people with the Metabolic Syndrome die from thrombotic complications superimposed to degenerative arterial vascular lesions, mostly myocardial infarction.
Type-2-Diabetes is a risk factor per se for such complications, but often clusters with dyslipoproteinemia, hypertension and obesity.
This is referred to as "Metabolic Syndrome" and often operates on a genetically programmed susceptibility which accelerates the pathogenesis of coronary artery disease in front of a much wider diabetes specific cardiopathy.
From a pathophysiological point of view none of these associated risk factors explains the pathogenetic series of events leading to the precipitation of an occlusive thrombus at sites of complicated coronary plaques.
In patients with the Metabolic Syndrome the coagulation system is switched towards a prethrombotic state, involving increased plasmatic coagulation, diminished fibrinolysis, decreased endothelial thromboresistance and predominantly platelet hyperreactivity ("diabetic thrombocytopathy").
Some of these factors are associated with an increased coronary risk (e.g.
fibrinogen, PAI-1, platelets), but are also directly linked to the pathogenesis of "atherothrombosis".
Altered cardiac remodelling together with adhesion and coagulation mechanisms appears suitable to explain decreased functional performance of infarcted organs, decreased success of acute (reduced fibrinolytic response, no reflow phenomenon) and longterm intervention strategies for vessel patency (PTCA, CABG) in Diabetes.
Glucose adjustment alone will not adequately neutralize these complex mechanisms, but in the situation of myocardial infarction eumetabolization with parenteral glucose-insulin-potassium infusion appears mandatory similar to non-diabetics.
On the longterm a multidimensional interventional repertoire is required particularly in patients with the Metabolic Syndrome including antihypertensive, antidyslipoproteinemic and antithrombotic drugs, customized according to the individual patients needs as assessed by early diagnostic measures ("early secondary prevention").
The indication for operative treatment in spondylolisthesis results from pain, progressive sliding and, in up to 60 % of the patients with progressive dislocation, from radicular malfunction.
The posterolateral fusion in situ is a safe procedure, but the deformation remains and in spondyloptosis plastic deformation of the fusion mass can lead to further dislocation.
With the external fixator as an instrument for reduction and the internal fixator for stabilization the reduction of even serious spondyloptosis and the recovery of a normal spine alignement and posture is possible, with an acceptable neurological risk.
Therefore a concept of treatment is suggested, which as a rule is aiming at the anatomical reduction of the dislocated vertrebra beside stabilization and nerveroot decompression.
Depending on the extent of the slip, reduction and stabilization is to be performed in one, two or three stages.
An anterior or posterior fusion is sufficient in grade I dislocation.
In grade II-V a combined posterior and anterior surgical proceedure is recommended.
Objectives: This study was conducted to evaluate a modified technique of interskalene brachial plexus anaesthesia (ISB) and postoperative catheter analgesia for shoulder surgery.
The original method described by Winnie bears some rare but life-threatening complications (inadvertent subarachnoid or intra-arterial injection, pneumothorax).
Objectives: Due to its low solubility and negligible metabolism, desflurane is assumed to be especially suitable for application by low-flow anaesthetic techniques.
The aim of this clinical investigation was the development of a standardised dosing scheme for low-flow and minimal-flow desflurane anaesthesia.
Methods: One hundred six ASA status I-II patients were assigned to six groups according to the duration of the initial high-flow phase, fresh gas flow, and fresh-gas desflurane concentration.
The median age, height, body weight, and constitution of the groups was comparable.
After an initial high-flow phase using 4.4 l/min, the fresh gas flow was reduced to 0.5 l/min (minimal-flow anaesthesia) or 1.0 l/min (low-flow anaesthesia).
Inspired nitrous oxide concentrations were maintained at 60% to 70%.
Using different standardised schemes of vaporizer settings, inspired desflurane concentrations were applied in the range from 3.4% to 8.7%, i.e., between 1 and 1.5 MAC.
Inspired and expired desflurane concentrations were measured continuously by the side-stream technique and recorded on-line.
Venous blood samples were taken immediately prior to induction and 45 min after flow reduction for measurement of carboxyhaemoglobin (COHb) concentration).
Results: In the 10- to 15-min initial phase during which a high fresh gas flow of 4.4 l/min was used, the inspired desflurane concentration reached values in the range of 90%-95% of the fresh gas concentration.
In low-flow anaesthesia this concentration could be maintained without any alteration of the vaporizer setting, whereas in minimal-flow anaesthesia with flow reduction the fresh gas concentration had to be increased by 1% to 2%: The quotient calculated by division of the inspired desflurane concentration by its fresh gas concentration (Q=CI/CF) ranges between 0.65 and 0.75 in minimal-flow and between 0.80 and 0.85 in low-flow anaesthesia.
If use was made of the wide output range of the desflurane vaporizer, the inspired concentration could be increased rapidly by about 5% in 8 min, although the flow was kept constant at 0.5 l/min.
Compared with its value prior to induction (2.13 +/- 1.05%), the COHb concentration decreased statistically significantly by about 0.7% during the 1st hour of minimal-flow anaesthesia (1.42 +/- 1.01%).
In no case was a COHb concentration observed that exceeded threatening or even toxic values, although the soda lime was changed routinely only once a week.
Conclusions: The pharmacokinetic properties of desflurane, resulting in especially low individual uptake, and the wide output range of the vaporizer facilitate the use of low-flow anaesthetic techniques in routine clinical practice.
Even in minimal-flow anaesthesia, the duration of the initial high-flow phase can be shortened to min.
If the flow is reduced to 1 l/min, the inspired desflurane concentration achieved in the initial high-flow phase can be maintained without any alteration of the vaporizer setting.
In minimal-flow anaesthesia, however, with flow reduction to 0.5 l/min, the fresh gas concentration has to be increased to a value 1%-2% higher than the inspired nominal value.
Due to the wide dialling range of the desflurane vaporizer, the amount of vapour delivered into the breathing system can be increased to about 110 ml/min even at a flow of 0.5 l/min.
The large amount of agent that can be delivered into the system even under low-flow conditions, together with the very low individual uptake, results in a time-constant that is sufficiently short for the clinically required rapid increase in inspired desflurane concentrations.
The short time-constant of low-flow desflurane anaesthesia improves the control of the anaesthetic concentration.
If all measures are taken to safely avoid inadvertent drying out of the soda lime, there is no evidence that low-flow anaesthesia with desflurane is liable to increase the risk of accidental ca
Arterial port systems are frequently used in the adjuvant and palliative therapy of colorectal hepatic metastasis.
Specific complications are rarely documented in literature.
The perforation of an arterial Port-a-cath followed by duodenal fistula is an uncommon complication of regional hepatic chemotherapy.
Besides systemic disorders caused by the chemotherapeutic agents, such as vomiting, sickness, or gastritis and duodenitis, gastroduodenal ulcers can occur as a local complication of treatment.
Thrombosis of the hepatic artery or occlusion of the port device are the most common reasons for withdrawal of treatment in our series.
Based on our experience and the case report of a duodenal fistula we recommend angiography of the port system prior to each cycle of chemotherapy.
Background: Coenesthesias can be defined as disorders of body perception or body hallucinations, projected in different parts of the body.
Patients complain of intractable pain or dysesthesia.
These symptoms are reported even from organs where we usually have no perception.
Coenesthesia must be regarded as a symptom that can be observed in various psychiatric diseases, e.g., schizophrenia.
However, in rare cases coenesthesias can be documented in neurological diseases, e.g., intracranial tumors or infections.
Therefore, accurate assessment of possible differential diagnoses is important.
In late stages, coenesthesias can easily be recognized because of their "bizarre" character.
In early stages, however, patients often complain of intractable, unlocalizable burning pain.
They frequently undergo operations because of their great suffering.
The drug treatment of first choice is neuroleptics, but the results are unpredictable.
Question: What risks do different forms of immunosuppression (azathioprine, Cyclosporin, azathioprine/Cyclosporin plus steroids) represent in pregnancy for the mother and fetus after kidney transplantation?
Retrospective analysis of 40 pregnancies and deliveries.
Investigation of abortion -, premature birth rate, fetal retardation, malformation, hospitalization, modus of labour, birth weight, gestational age, perinatal mortality, hypertonia, preeclampsia, anemia, kidney function, rejection crisis, mechanical compression, kidney function after 1 and 5 years postpartum.
Recommendation guideline: preconceptional time (contraception) and intensive care in pregnancy.
The risk of pregnancy is justified if the presuppositions are correct and the woman would urgently like to have a child.
Studies on the everyday life of the elderly often deal with visible behavior.
In this study, the subjective experience of the everyday living environment was investigated, paying special consideration to the role of mobility impairment.
Two approaches, one oriented toward the subject's experience of the home environment, another oriented toward the environmental specifics of the individual's favorite place, were employed.
Is the experience of living at home different for individuals with various levelsults were found in the experience of cognitive, biographical, and spatial dimensions of the living environment.
Similarities were found in the experience of emotional, social, and behavioral dimensions of one's home.
Competence loss played an important role in how the subjects experienced living at home, yet even the mobility impaired experienced their home as a environment which could be shaped.
The environment-oriented approach showed that the favorite place of mobility impaired persons was characterized by higher spatial density.
Finally, an examination of four home environment profiles using cluster analysis illustrated the connection between both person- and environment-oriented approaches and offered insights into a transactional perspective of person and environment.
Even though the subjective experience of one's home environment is not easily quantifiable in terms of maintaining everyday competence, it nonetheless imparts meaning to the elderly person's daily life.
The main advantage of the bilateral medial rectus faden operation (posterior fixation suture) for the treatment of essential infantile esotropia is the low occurrence of delayed consecutive exotropia.
Nevertheless, this unwanted complication also occasionally occurs after a faden operation.
We report the rare development of a myoepithelial carcinoma in a pleomorphic adenoma involving the minor salivary glands in the buccal mucosa of a 78-year-old female.
Tumor presented as a small asymptomatic left buccal mass.
The initial dominant component of the neoplasm was a pleomorphic adenoma, while the minor component was a myoepithelial carcinoma.
Recurrences of tumor after 2 and then 5 years were excised.
Histopathological examination of the last tissue removed showed a pure myoepithelial carcinoma of the minor salivary glands without evidence for a pleomorphic adenoma.
The clinical features, therapy, diagnosis, histopathology and literature are reviewed.
The purpose of this prospective study was to determine concomittant lesions of glenohumeral dislocation and their correlation with the outcome, to determine the influence of various stabilizing operation techniques on the outcome.
106 shoulders [104 patients, 81 men, 23 women, mean age 36 (16-83) years] operated because of shoulder instability after at minimum one shoulder luxation between 1988 to 1995 were evaluated 3 years (0.8-8 years) postoperatively using Constant score.
Preoperative arthroscopy was performed to document intraarticular lesions.
There were 7 reluxations (5 because of a new accident), mostly after Putti-Platt procedures.
The average modified Constant Score was 66 (10-85) points (maximum 85).
29 patients (27%) had less than 60 points, mostly because of pain and restriction of function, and were evaluated as poor.
Lesions of rotator cuff, long biceps tendon and subscapularis tendon had a bad prognosis.
The severity of arthroscopically found lesions correlated with the outcome.
Operations with shortening of subscapularis tendon or using a bone graft gave bad results.
Anatomic reconstruction of the labrum-ligament complex in combination with a plasty of the extended capsule gave best results.
Preoperative arthroscopy can determine the extent of different lesions after shoulder luxation which influence the outcome and is useful to select the optimal operation technique.
Prenatal determination of fetal blood groups by DNA amplification today is possible for Rhesus D, eE, cC, Kell (K1/2), Duffy (Fya/b) and Kidd (Jka/b).
Current assays using multiplex PCR and at least two specific primers as well as an intern control offer a diagnostic power of more than 99%.
In all pregnancies complicated by irregular blood group antibodies, blood group typing in amniotic fluid allows to reduce the number of invasive procedures.
PCR typing is recommended in all cases with a heterozygous father and an increased antibody level or suspicious findings during ultrasound evaluation.
Adjuvant therapy with interferon for malignant melanoma causes neurotoxic side effects such as depression.
The biochemical mechanisms are unknown.
We report two cases with both depression and amnesia.
In one case, attempted suicide was a companied by 7 h of amnesia.
The diagnostic classification and possible explanations for the amnesia secondary to interferon therapy are reviewed.
Molecular and epidemiological studies have confirmed that human pathogenic papillomaviruses (HPV)types 16 and 18 are causally involved in the developement of carcinoma of the cervix.
This statement is also true, albeit with reservations as yet, of other so-called high-risk HPV types, such as HPV 31, 33, 35, 39, 45, 51, 52, 56 and 58.
Around 500,000 women throughout the world become ill with carcinoma of the cervix every year, and 1-4% of all younger women have a precancer of the cervix uteri.
This knowledge of the viral origin of anogenital neoplasms has not yet been exploited for primary and secondary prevention of these illnesses, however.
This is mainly because infection with genital HPV types is very prevalent in young women but seldom leads to carcinoma.
In this review, therefore, the most important epidemiological data available on cervical carcinoma and its preliminary stages are analysed with reference to an association with HPV.
In addition, the molecular biological data on HPV as it relates to anogenital carcinogenesis are presented.
In conclusion, the significance of HPV for the prevention of carcinoma of the cervix is discussed.
We report the case of a 43-year-old woman who had a cardiogenic shock due to an acute inferior myocardial infarction.
Her husband and a general practitioner living in the neighborhood initially performed cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
A prehospital emergency physician found ventricular fibrillation when he arrived after 20 minutes.
It was impossible to achieve stable rhythm by 42 attemps of defibrillation.
Therefore, the patient was carried to our clinic under ongoing cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
A cardiologist was informed with radio signal.
Percutaneous cardiopulmonary support (pCPS) was implanted in the emergency department after 100 minutes of cardiac arrest.
After stabilizing the hemodynamic situation by pCPS (4-5 l/min) it was possible to transfer the patient to the catheterization laboratory.
Angiography revealed proximal occlusion of a dominant right coronary artery.
After successful angioplasty it was possible to reestablish stable sinus rhythm by single defibrillation.
By use of intra-aortic balloon pump (IABP) the flow rate of pCPS was reduced every two hours.
After 10 hours of support pCPS was explaned.
IABP was needed for three days.
The patient was discharged from hospital without any relevant neurological deficits after nine weeks.
By using pCPS it is possible to stabilize the patient's hemodynamic situation and to perform diagnostic and therapeutic procedures if other means of resuscitation do not suffice.
The use of pCPS in resuscitation is indicated in circulatory arrest if further therapeutic options seem promising.
Defects of the frontoorbital complex subsequent to extensive tumor surgery or severe trauma often result in aesthetic and functional disharmonies.
The long-term results of rehabilitation related to different materials and techniques are the subject of this study.
From 1974 to 1996 altogether 127 patients with bony defects of the orbit and/or the skull base underwent surgery.
All patients' data were documented prospectively from 1984 onwards.
The results following reconstruction with autologous calvarian transplants in 52 patients were compared to those of a control group which received iliac bone or PMMA implants.
Eighty-one bony defects (64%) resulted from tumor resection; 37 patients (29%) suffered from the effects of trauma.
In 67 cases (53%) reconstruction was performed primarily, in 51 cases (40%) secondarily.
Free or pedicled soft-tissue transplants were necessary in order to separate the orbit and the neurocranium in 26% of the defects.
On the other hand, small, isolated defects of the orbital roof (7%) were left without any reconstructive procedure.
Contrary to the iliac bone grafts, the calvarian transplants resisted secondary resorption.
Postoperative infections appeared in two cases; loss of transplants was avoided entirely in the group of calvarian reconstructions in contrast to the alloplasts.
The selection of a suitable donor site area and rigid fixation with microplates led to excellent esthetic results even in cases with large defects.
Within inpatient psychotherapy traditionally different therapeutic approaches are combined.
Usually verbal interventions of different orientations and settings (e.g.
individual and group therapy), nonverbal procedures (e.g.
music and art therapy) and bodyoriented techniques are included.
The combinations is merely additive, integrated or eclectic.
Little is known about the reciprocal interrelation of such combinations.
Along the example of a definite additive combination of psychodynamic and behavioural psychotherapy for agoraphobias and obsessive disorders a rationale for the interrelationship of the different therapeutic components is discussed.
We report an 18-year old woman with surgically proven primary hyperparathyroidism (pHPT) and normal intact parathyroid hormone (iPTH) serum levels.
The reason for this rare biochemical presentation are possible biologically active amino-terminal parathyroid hormone polypeptide fragments not detected by the widely used two-site immunoradiometric parathyroid hormone assay (PTH IRMA).
Diagnosis and therapy of primary hyperparathyroidism therefore should not exclusively rest on the finding of hypercalcemia coupled with an elevated iPTH level.
Viral hepatitis belongs to the most important infectious diseases worldwide.
More than 300 million chronic HBsAg carriers and chronic HCV carriers exist, respectively.
High endemic areas of viral hepatitis are Asia, Africa, Latin America and the Near, Middle and Far East.
Viral hepatitis is also very important in health care workers.
Today viral hepatitis can be differentiated from type A to type E (G) based on immunological and molecular assays.
While enterally transmitted hepatitis type A and type E only induce acute and rare fulminant disease, hepatitis type B, C and D often induce chronic progressive disease including liver cirrhosis with typical complications due to the portal hypertension and with a high rate of association with the development of primary liver cancer (HCC).
This review focusses on viral hepatitis-related surgical problems, including liver transplantation.
Hypertensive diseases in pregnancy (HDP) are one of the most frequent causes of maternal death and perinatal mortality.
However, chronic hypertension without complications has a more favorable prognosis than preeclampsia.
Apart from a familial predisposition, mutations of various genes may also be responsible; among these, APC resistance is of particular clinical significance.
The insufficient endovascular invasion of trophoblast in the spiral aterioles is still considered to represent the pathogenetic basis of preeclampsia.
Increased lipid oxidation, deported membrane components of syncytiotrophoblasts, and increased invasion of fetal cells in the maternal circulation triggering immunological reactions are discussed as the causes.
The result is an endothelial imbalance between vasoconstrictory-aggregating and vasodilatatory-antiaggregating compounds.
The results of studies on the relevance of NO synthase are controversial.
Currently, neither reliable methods for the early detection nor certain preventative measures to avoid the disease are available.
Intensive care monitoring and therapy are essential for pregnant women with severe HDP.
The obstetric procedure depends on the severity and dynamics of the disease as well as the state of development of the baby.
When the pregnancy is continued defined guidelines for its termination for maternal or fetal indications must be taken into consideration.
After delivery, the mother must be intensively monitored for at least 24 to 48 hours (postpartal eclampsia/HELLP syndrome).
The risk for recurrence of the preeclampsia is between 20 and 26 % or when it occurred in the second trimester up to 65 % while that of HELLP syndrome is between 3.5 and 24 %.
Acanthosis nigricans is a hyperkeratotic mucocutaneous eruption of heterogenous etiology which is characterized by hyperpigmentation, velvety cutaneous thickening, intensified skin markings and development of verrucous excrescences typically involving the intertriginous areas.
Malignant acanthosis nigricans is most often associated with an abdominal adenocarcinoma frequently unresectable at the time of diagnosis.
We report on the rare association of acanthosis nigricans with a transitional cell carcinoma of the urinary bladder.
Symptomatic treatment with topical calcipotriol significantly reduced the hyperkeratotic and papillomatous skin changes.
The goal of this evaluation study is to analyze the effects of a new gerontopsychiatric institution, the gerontopsychiatric center (GC: a combination of a home-based outpatient service, a day-hospital and a consulting office for elderly with mental disorders) on the reorganization process of the treatment system from intramural toward extramural structures, as experts of the government of the FRG have been demanding for a long time.
Based on data of cross-sectional and longitudinal studies two regional catchment areas - the city of Bielefeld (without GC, control region) and the district of Gütersloh (with GC) - are compared and analyzed, whether changes within the gerontopsychiatric system (subsystem A), the system of general medical treatment (subsystem B), or within the elderly care system (subsystem C) occurred.
Concerning subsystem A the results are that the GC has a strong impact on the intended shift from intra- to extramural structures, without selecting patients by diagnosis nor by severity degrees of their mental disorders in extramural treatment facilities.
The home-based outpatient treatment is especially successful for elderly with a functional psychic disorder.
These patients had the highest scores in improvement of psychiatric symptoms as well as in reduction of their self-care deficits within one year Effects of the GC on subsystem B were evident soon after its establishment, for example, by the increasing cooperation between the gerontopsychiatric health services and general hospitals in the region with GC, in which (hospitals) two fifths of all clinical gerontopsychiatric patients with a mental disorder as the main diagnosis (ICD-9) are treated.
An effect of the GC on subsystem C is possibly the fact that in its region the rate of direct transfers of patients from the clinical gerontopsychiatric department into homes for the elderly is significantly lower than in the region without GC.
In the field of psychoneuroimmunology it has become obvious that the immune system is governed by multiple influences from the central nervous system.
One approach to verify these interactions can be seen in stress research.
While the phenomenon of stress-induced changes in immunological processes is widely accepted, more recent studies focus on possible moderators and mechanisms of these responses.
Within this research strategy it became evident that catecholamine increases upon stress are of a major importance for the frequently observed mild leukocytosis.
The present study was conducted to investigate whether the often observed stress-induced increases in the number of peripheral lymphocyte subsets depends on the amount of epinephrine or norepinephrine release.
Moreover, the question was addressed whether high or low catecholamine release is related to subjective ratings on discomfort.
Using a "public speaking paradigm" we were able to replicate previous findings of high increases in the absolute number of CD8+ and CD56+ cells in peripheral blood.
Moreover, when dividing subjects into high and low catecholamine responders, the amount of change was significantly larger in catecholamine responders irrespective of whether norepinephrine or epinephrine was used for grouping the subjects.
However, high and low catecholamine responders did not differ with respect to subjective ratings on discomfort.
The data are discussed with respect to underlying mechanisms in catecholamine-induced lymphocyte migration and possible reasons for the mismatch between objective and subjective indicators of stressor efficacy.
We report a locally recurrent retiform haemangioendothelioma (RHE) on the right great toe in a 40-year-old woman.
There was a secondary soft tissue lesion on her right lower leg.
Histologically, primary lesion, local recurrence and the secondary soft tissue lesion (soft tissue metastasis?)
Long, arborizing, neoplastic blood vessels were lined by CD31 and factor VIII-positive, monomorphic endothelial tumour cells; focally solid tumour areas, papillae and a prominent inflammatory infiltrate consisting of mature B and T lymphocytes were noted.
The concept and the group of low-grade malignant vascular neoplasms is discussed, with special emphasis on inclusion of RHE in this category.
HMSN is a hereditary symmetric ascending neuropathy of the peripherial nerves.
Several cases of HMSN with motility disorders of both eyes have been reported in the literature.
We describe a patient with HMSN type 1 and an incomplete peripherial 3rd nerve palsy of the right eye.
To the best of our knowledge, this is the first report of developed unilateral oculomotor disorder in a patient with HMSN.
A 34-year-old male (190 cm/100 kg) was scheduled for surgery of the nasal septum.
He had had uneventful anaesthesia for appendicectomy 14 years earlier: following 600 mg thiopentone, 180 mg suxamethonium and up to 2 vol.% halothane for 20 min had been used and no symptoms of malignant hyperthermia (MH) were recorded.
Following oral premedication with 2 mg flunitrazepam at 7.00 a.m. anaesthesia was induced with a priming dose of atracurium at 8.45 a.m. followed by 0.2 mg fentanyl, 500 mg thiopentone, and 100 mg suxamethonium.
Endotracheal intubation was accomplished easily [9], and the patient was ventilated manually in a semi-closed circle system until spontaneous ventilation resumed.
Enflurane (1.5% for 5 min, 1.0% for 10 min, and 0.8% until the diagnosis of MH was suspected) was given in 33% O2/66% N2O.
Seventy minutes after induction it was noted that the spontaneous respiratory rate and minute volume had risen continuously from 10/min and 6 l/min, respectively, to 20/min and 12 l/min.
Attempts at deepening anaesthesia with repeated doses of fentanyl up to a total dose of 0.95 mg failed to reduce the hyperventilation.
In spite of a high fresh gas flow of 6 l/min and assisted manual ventilation, the FIO2 started to fall from 0.34 to 0.28 at 10:20 a.m.
The O2/N2O ratio was changed to 1 : 1, but the FIO2 remained at 0.3.
MH was suspected, enflurane was discontinued, and an arterial blood gas analysis was done (Table 2).
When marked acidosis and hypercarbia were found, dantrolene 2.5 mg/kg was given, the operation was terminated, and the patient's trachea was extubated and he was monitored closely in the intensive care unit for 24 h. Vital signs were stable (Table 3) and no further complications were observed.
The patient did not mention pain or uneasiness postoperatively.
About 6 months later, a muscle biopsy was done according to the European MH Protocol [5] and the patient was found to be MHEh.
In this case five main reasons for the hypercarbia and mixed acidosis must be considered (Table 1).
Firstly, hypoventilation does not seem to be reasonable as the patient was ventilated with 8 to 12 l/min, which is within the range of 80 - 120 mg/kg - min.
Secondly, we can exclude shock and hypoperfusion because the patient had a normal blood pressure and heart rate (within 65 - 90 beats/min), his fingertips and skin were well perfused, his body temperature was 37  °C, and there was no sign of muscle rigidity.
Thirdly, a defect of the CO2 adsorber as well as CO2 admixture to the N2O and O2 ventilation gases can cause hypercarbia.
We use two absorbers in sequence of which one is changed every day, and found neither a change in colour of the indicator nor an abnormally raised temperature of the absorbers [11].
A postoperative check of the ventilator showed no defect in the O2/N2O supply and a correctly functioning anaesthesia apparatus.
A malfunction of both CO2 absorbers resulting in intraoperative hypercarbia could not explain a postoperative mixed acidosis lasting for more than 6 h. Anaesthesias performed at the same time using soda lime from the same canisters were totally uneventful.
It is concluded that the hypercarbia and mixed acidosis were caused by hypermetabolism.
A thorough postoperative examination by an internist did not reveal any thyroid, pulmonary, endocrine, or circulatory reason for our intra- and postoperative findings.
Iatrogenic factors like superficial anaesthesia or systemic side effects of adrenaline admixture to local anaesthetics can cause hypermetabolism without striking clinical signs, but they do not cause mixed acidosis lasting longer than 6 h (Table 2).
The most suitable explanation in this case is an abortive form of MH.
